Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
Number of Reviews
39

Author
James Brundage
I'm a font man. I love seeing the nice things I can do with the text. I like
Comic Sans MS, Garamond, Lucida Handwriting. I also like to use Subscript,
Superscript, Strikethrough, Italics, and Bold. Maybe that's why I like this
year of film so much, because it's BOLD. In a decade of cinema mediocrity,
of people unwilling to take risks outside of the independent art film world,
the studios have only recently come back to the liberal, arty and
intelligent cinema that SCREAMS at you: I'M GOOD.
Since the beginning of this year, we've seen risk takers coming out of the
studios: New Line's "Dark City", a sci-fi flick with a David Lynch look,
Paramount's "The Truman Show", an Orwellian look towards the future of
television, "Saving Private Ryan", a bloody portrait of what World War Two
was really like, and, now, "Pleasentville", a movie that can smile and
satire at the same time.
A massive allegory and satire from frame one, where we flip channels while
looking for the previews for the "Pleasentville", where everything's just
swell... on the outside. On the inside, it seems devoid of the freedoms we
hold dear.
Everything seems picture perfect, but then things go wrong when Jenniffer
(Renee Witherspoon) starts to mess with the order of the universe, asking
"What lies beyond Pleasentville?". When she goes further, taking someone up
to lover's lane for more than just nothing, people start turning colors from
black and white. Change is coming, and no one likes it.
The film, as I said, is an allegory of the late fifties and early sixties, a
political agenda "change is good" motion picture that often screams its
metaphors in your face, but in such fun ways that you can't help but smile.
It's a film for the baby boomers in all of us, the ones who think back to
that time and remember as the change was coming and coming fast, and how it
took the world by storm with a fight.
It's a change from the normal for me, too. A bold film that you can relax
and enjoy the complexity without having it drown you. And, unlike films like
Saving Private Ryan, which made you face the horror of the day, and The
Truman Show, which had a dismal view of the future, this one lets you smile,
lets you come out happier than you came in, and feeling more intelligent to
boot.

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis D. Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Calvin:  Dad, how come old photographs are always black and white?  Didn't
they have color film back then?
Calvin's Dad:  Sure they did.  In fact, those old photographs are in
color.  It's just that the world was black and white then.
Calvin's Dad:  Yep.  The world didn't turn color until sometime in the
1930's and it was pretty grainy color there for a while.
Calvin:  But then why are old paintings in color?  If the world was black
and white, wouldn't artists have painted it that way?
Calvin's Dad:  Not necesarily.  A lot of great artists were insane.
Calvin:  But... but how could they have painted in color anyway?  Wouldn't
their paints have been shades of gray back then?
Calvin's Dad:  Of course.  But they turned colors like everything else did
in the 30's.
--  Bill Watterson, Scientific Progress Goes "Boink", A Calvin & Hobbes
Collection
There are only two good things about Pleasantville.  One is that it made me
get my Calvin and Hobbes books out of the closet to find that quote.  The
other is the seamless integration of color and black-and-white images as
the small TV town of Pleasantville metamorphizes into a colored world.
Other than that, there's not much to recommend this awkward puzzler of a
movie about a town that struggles as its population and landscape starts to
take on new hues.
We've seen this technique before, most notably in Schindler's List, where
Steven Spielberg chose to color his black-and-white vision of the Holocaust
by showing us the color of a doomed girl's red dress and the bright flame
of candles.  But Schindler's List had a great story to tell -- the color
was just a device to accent two moving and poignant scenes.  In
Pleasantville, the color changes aren't accents, they're the whole story --
and it's not a story that's emotionally compelling in any way.  (Although
the line between Pleasantvillians and the Nazis turns out to be very
narrow.)
Pleasantville draws from two main sources of inspiration:  time travel and
alternate reality.  In this instance, two modern quarreling teenagers
(Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon) are thrust into the alternate
universe of a 1950's television sitcom.  While this seems like an original
concept (or it must have seemed like an original concept to the studio
bosses who greenlighted it), both strands of this genre have been done
before, with better results.  Back to the Future, a less ambitious but more
entertaining movie, effectively showed the culture shock of a modern
teenager coping with a world without MTV.  Peggy Sue Got Married does an
even better job of cultural juxtaposition.
Pleasantville is able to manage only a few pokes at satire in a setting
that's ripe for it -- even the wretched-beyond-words Last Action Hero and
the listless Truman Show managed to skewer their respective targets
somewhat effectively.  The only cleverness exhibited by the script is in
its references to the segregation rampant in the 50's:  the people who have
transformed from black-and-white to Technicolor are branded as "coloreds"
and forced to sit in the balcony of the courthouse.
The problems of Pleasantville have nothing to do with the cast.  Maguire is
given the lead, and he's effective and touching as the leader of the
"coloreds".  He starts out as an uber-geek, a fanatical devotee of the
Pleasantville reruns on a "Nick at Nite" knockoff.  When he wrestles with
his sister for the remote control on the night of the Pleasantville
marathon, he shouts that he's been waiting a year for this -- and we
believe him, and that's very very sad.  Somehow, he matures emotionally
during his stay in Pleasantville, and it's a treat to see his character
transform into a compassionate and sensitive adult.  But his character is a
mass of paradoxes.  Thrust into his ideal fantasy world, he screams to be
let out, presumably to watch the show some more.  He watches the show
ostensibly to bask in the parental love missing in his dysfunctional
family, but we never see him spending much quality time with his parents.
He wants to preserve the town of Pleasantville, but ends up altering it
forever.  We're never sure what Maguire is thinking, or why he acts the way
he does -- a trait, unfortunately, he shares with his fellow townsfolk.
Witherspoon sparks the sexual revolution in Pleasantville and then all but
disappears.  She looks outstanding in black and white, and she makes angora
sweaters look better than anyone this side of Johnny Depp in Ed Wood.  But
she's given very little to do in the second half of the movie, and the
movie is poorer for it.
The Pleasantville parents are absolutely dead-on in their portrayal.
Veterans William Macy and Joan Allen look like they were born to play their
roles of Mom and Dad.  I would have loved to have seen Macy get a little
bit crazy with the whole family-man thing, the way he did in Fargo, but
instead he settles into befuddlement.  Allen is the spouse who gets to
rebel, but her transformation from prim housewife to town scandal happens
so sharply that it's scarcely credible.
Of the other grownups, Jeff Daniels is wasted as a soda jerk with an odd
learning-disability who learns to paint overnight, while the late great
J.T. Walsh glowers effectively in his last performance.  (Don Knotts makes
the least sense of anyone in the whole movie as the TV repairman who sends
Maguire and Witherspoon on their journey:  if he's a comic genius, then I'm
Pauline Kael.)
Pleasantville reminds me of a film that seems to be its polar opposite:
Alex Proyas's brooding nightmare Dark City.  Both films are well-cast, with
outstanding set designs and cinematography emanating from an overarching
vision.  But neither of them has a plot to speak of.  They both lie up
there on the screen like well-dressed corpses, waiting for a spark to
animate them.  Dark City is marginally worse, I suppose, because it's
largely humorless, but it's a close call.
I did like one scene in Pleasantville, where the high school kids stand in
line waiting to go to the library, whose books have miraculously sprouted
words.  Kudos to Pleasantville for encouraging reading.  And that's the
message of this review as well:  Don't watch Pleasantville, read a book
instead.  (And no, sorry, Calvin and Hobbes books don't count.)
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Tabasco sauce is to bachelor cooking what forgiveness is to sin."

Author
Jerry Saravia

The 1950's is a period of innocence that remains as much a memory as anyone
who lived through it. The 1990's is a harmful, jaded era that does not accord
to the values and customs of yesteryear. Fat chance that we'll ever adapt to
such an innocence again. "Pleasantville" is one of the most ironic, original
movies of the year that touches on what separates the 50's from the 90's. Is it
moral decay, or is it something fundamentally deeper about ourselves? 
The film begins with a television ad for the 50's show, "Pleasantville," with
a spirit reminiscent of the nostalgic sitcoms shown on Nick at Nite. A smiling
David (Tobey Maguire) is watching the show - he's a huge fan of the show and
knows all the episodes by heart. He lives in the real world of the 90's
complete with a divorced working mother and an oversexed sister, Jennifer
(Reese Witherspoon). The girls at school pay him no mind, and how can they if
his normal topic of conversation is about the minutiae in "Pleasantville."
One evening while his mother is away on a trip, he watches the show and fights
with his sister over the remote control. As they are fighting, they are zapped
away into their TV to the placid existence of Pleasantville! David and Jennifer
are now Bud and Mary Sue Parker! Their parents are the goody-good Parkers
(flawlessly played by William H. Macy and Joan Allen) who offer a high-calorie
breakfast, including a plate full of fat pancakes and lots of syrup. 
The world of Pleasantville is a sight unlike anything in the 90's mainly
because it is not a real place. The local fireman only saves cats. The
high-school boys never miss the rim shot when playing basketball. The
high-school kids say "swell," as opposed to "cool." There is no existence
beyond this town and, worse yet, they are all in black-and-white! "We're
supposed to be in color," says Jennifer, assured that they are in Nerdville. 
David doesn't react with any hostility to the town he knows so well. He works
at the local soda shop along with the bland Mr. Johnson (Jeff Daniels), who
doesn't know what to do when David switches chores at closing time. Of course,
the one who starts trouble in this harmless town is Jennifer. She tells her
pseudo mother, Betty Parker, that masturbation, and sex at Lover's Lane (where
couples mostly hold hands), is worth trying. Betty goes to take a bath, excites
herself, and the tree next their house goes up in colored flames - something
this town has never seen. 
It wouldn't be fair to give away any of the other surprises that
"Pleasantville" has in store because the surprises are not the main thrill -
the movie is a rich, human drama with touches of humor. The combination of
black-and-white and color cinematography within the same shot is astoundingly
good, yet the movie isn't just decorated with effects. The effects are used
only as part of fundamental thematic concerns. In essence, the deeper message
in "Pleasantville" isn't that we should let go of our inhibitions about sex,
but that we shouldn't resist taking that step to wherever our destiny leads us.
The performances are right on target and make the themes resonate long after
the film is over. Not enough can be raved about William H. Macy as the
straight-arrow George Parker - an actor who surprises me in every film he's
appeared in. He's perfectly cast and his ironic tone, when shouting 'Honey, I'm
home!', is poignant and regaling. Joan Allen, one of the best actresses working
right now, delivers another nuanced, heartbreaking performance as the
always-smiling Betty Parker, whose own life is awakened by sexual
possibilities, like having an affair with Mr. Johnson. What's most refreshing
is that these two amazing actors slowly strip away any shred of stereotyping
and reveal genuine human characters.
Tobey Maguire is one of those rare pleasures in the movies, a grown-up version
of Kevin Kline (both appeared in "The Ice Storm" along with Allen). He has an
ability to make us aware of what he's thinking all the time. His best scenes
are when he applies black-and-white makeup to Betty's colored face, and when he
tells stories to an avid crowd about places existing beyond their quaint little
town while the music from Dave Brubeck's "Take Five" slips in quietly in the
soundtrack. 
Reese Witherspoon is also a rare delight (even in slipshod material like
"Freeway"), and she nicely conveys a human soul in the very nineties, soulless
Jennifer. It is also gratifying to witness her gradual transformation from
vixen to intellectual.
"Pleasantville" is purely a pop extravaganza written and directed by Gary Ross
("Big"). The movie does not have the thrust or the verve of "Back to the
Future," a similar 50's fantasy parable that depended more on irony through
humor. It also ends on an unsatisfying note whereas some real imagination would
have given it the necessary thematic conclusion. 
The merits supersede the flaws, however, and a super script and an excellent
ensemble cast make "Pleasantville" as joyous and human a film as we're likely
to see from Hollywood this year. Its morals about thinking for yourself and
appreciating beauty through love and knowledge may be simplistic, but they are
thought-provoking and pleasant, indeed. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Author
Kevin Patterson
Several months after THE TRUMAN SHOW impressed critics and audiences, we
now get PLEASANTVILLE, the second of 1998's "protagonist trapped in a
television show" films. This one is written and directed by Gary Ross,
previously known as the screenwriter of BIG, in which a machine at a
carnival transplanted a 12-year-old into the body of an adult, and DAVE, in
which a mild-mannered nice guy successfully impersonated the President of
the United States for several years. There is some of the same whimsical
charm in PLEASANTVILLE, in which squabbling 1990s siblings David (Tobey
Maguire) and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon), find themselves transported into
an old "Leave It To Beaver"-style '50s black-and-white sitcom called, you
guessed it, "Pleasantville," where they assume the identities of two of the
series's main characters.
There's a catch. No one in PLEASANTVILLE knows anything beyond what they
need to function as TV characters. David's boss at the soda shop, Mr.
Johnson, doesn't know how to keep the shop running if David's not there to
set up the counter after he finishes wiping it off; one day David arrives
late to find Mr. Johnson standing there in confusion as he explains, "You
weren't here, so I just . . . kept wiping." No one actually learns anything
in school, since very few scenes actually take place there. The bathrooms
don't have any stalls (when was the last time you saw anybody relieving
themselves on network TV?). The firemen only know how to rescue cats from
trees and are totally perplexed as to what the hoses in the back of the
fire engine do.
For a while, it seems as if PLEASANTVILLE might turn into an amusing but
immature satire of the "family values" crowd. As David and Jennifer
introduce the citizens of Pleasantville to knowledge of the outside world,
their black-and-white existence literally starts to give way to color. Ross
makes a poor choice, however, by starting this off with Jennifer having sex
with her character's boyfriend. This isn't handled particularly well, and
it risks making an already bizarre story downright laughable. The movie
reaches what has to be its lowest point when a woman's sexual
experimentation apparently causes a tree in the back yard to burst into
flames; at this stage, I was beginning to wonder if "Gary Ross" was
actually a pseudonym for "Woody Allen on speed." (The scene does, at least,
lead to perhaps the funniest comic payoff, in which David has to summon the
clueless firemen by telling them there's a cat in a tree, grabs the hose
from their fire truck, and puts the fire out himself while one of them
looks around bewildered and asks, "Where's the cat?")
Fortunately, PLEASANTVILLE finds its feet soon after these initial
stumbles. The only other obvious political swipe is a more sophisticated
and relevant one, as the citizens who have remained black-and-white try to
keep their multichromatic neighbors away with "No Coloreds Allowed" signs
in the windows. And for the most part, Ross wisely chooses to downplay the
political in the latter half of the film, focusing instead on more basic
aspects of human experience. With the arrival of color comes the loss of
the town's idyllic existence. It clouds over and rains once in a while
instead of being sunny all the time, and the high school basketball team is
no longer invincible. The town's leaders think that the solution is punish
the "coloreds" and restrict things like painting in color, but in the end,
even they aren't impervious to the new knowledge and experience introduced
by David and Jennifer and find themselves becoming "colored" as well.
By the end of PLEASANTVILLE, I was, pardon the pun, pleasantly surprised to
see what had started off as a bizarre and occasionally sloppy comedy turn
into a rousing call to rise above complacency and self-satisfaction, as
Ross makes the case that short-term pain and confusion is often worth the
long-term benefits of change. It's not quite as polished and coherent as
THE TRUMAN SHOW, which dealt with similar themes, but it nevertheless
overcomes its lesser moments and still emerges in the end as one of the
best films of the year.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Page: http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Author
Kleszczewski, Nicholas
Allow me to let you into a critic's secret.  When a critic enjoys a
film, and agrees with the films' underlying message, it becomes "the
best film of the year", "a film of daring", a film of "great social
merit."  However, when a critic disagrees with the films' underlying
message, it becomes "preachy", "heavy-handed", and its filmmakers are
out to proselytize you.
Watching _Pleasantville_, I felt like I was being proselytized.
On the surface, it starts out daffy--two 90's kids being sucked into a
50's _Father Knows Best_ clone.  But it changes tone midway through,
and becomes a strong political tract.  The pie is overstuffed; there
are so many issues addressed that the film handles each of them
half-heartedly.
This is a shame, because the cinematography, while not totally
original (remember the old cherry 7 Up commercials?) is the first of
its kind for a mainstream film.  Gary Ross has the black & white
mundanity touched by spurts of color, that slowly begin to dominate
the landscape, the town, the people.
The big joke in _Pleasantville_ is that life is too perfect, too
wholesome.  When Jennifer and David (_Twilight_'s Reese Witherspoon
and _Ice Storm_'s Tobey Macguire) are sucked in by a magical remote
control device (given by a cheerfully off-beat Don Knotts cameo), they
begin to introduce its residents to the modern zietgiest.  It's not
just the sexual revolution, but introduction to modern art,
literature, and music.  Somehow, the "perfect" residents of this
imaginary world begin enjoying the "imperfect" standards and morales
that modern society has taken for granted.
This is where the screenplay gets derailed.  Before the color
revolution, the basketball team gets every shot.  When Pleasantville
begins changing, and "reality" sets in, they begin playing less than
stellar.  Ha ha.
But "reality" never truly settles in.  Premarital sex is introduced to
teenagers, but there's no consequences: no unwanted pregnancies, no
abortions, no sexually transmitted diseases.  Rock is introduced, but
the entire spectrum of modern rock, with all its morales, epithets,
and parental warning stickers, is deeply ignored.  The fifties' sitcom
zietgiest has been replaced by the nineties' sitcom zietgiest, and not
"reality."
Then the film moves in the direction against "book-burners" and
"censorship advocates", and falls prey to its own propaganda.  Sure,
popular censored books-of-the-month are mentioned by name: _Catcher in
the Rye_, _Huckleberry Finn_, _Lady Chatterley's Lover_.  But where's
the anti-Semetic _Mein Kampf_?  Where's the truly offensive
literature?  How about the most banned book in the history of the
world (which is, surprisingly, the Holy Bible)?  The range of "free
thinking" is shallow in ignoring the implications of its thought.
That's why the "censorship" debate is a false one.  Sure, books were
burned, and to this day, protests occur against offensive films and
off-Broadway productions.  BUT... in a society where freedom of
expression is celebrated, then it should be expected that both ideas
should be shared; that those offended have _as much right_ to voice
their discomfort over the art as the artist himself.  Those who burn
the books OWN the books that were burnt.  And if there were to be no
censorship ever in the world, then every library, every bookstore,
every videostore must contain every single book/art/video ever
produced.
The mob's voice isn't censored in _Pleasantville_.  Worse, they are
charicatured.  In the most surreal episode on _Pleasantville_, a nude
painting of Joan Allen's Betty Parker is displayed on a malt-shop
window.  The townsfolk appear, they incite a riot, they trash the
shop.  But no dialogue is heard amidst the screaming.  Possible
statements would include: (1) A painting like this is better placed in
a museum, not a malt shop; (2) Is this the right venue to broadcast to
the world that Mrs. Parker is having an illicit affair with
Mr. Johnson (Jeff Daniels); (3) The painting sucks.  All three
comments are legitimate statements, but are clouded by negative
stereotypes that Gary Ross is more than happy to employ.
Gary Ross wants it both ways ideologically.  In the opening moments,
he humorously recognizes that society is on a downward slope,
partially due to (must I say it?) _sin_.  At the same juncture, he
recognizes that because of the introduction of sin, life is more
colorful, more daring, more free.  This is most apparent in the
not-so-subtle reference to David's eating of the forbidden fruit;
later he is told that that one act is the reason for the downfall of
his surroundings.
So, according to Gary Ross, life is deteriorating because of sin.  But
because of sin, life is freeing and exhilorating.  Um... which is it?
Many moviegoers will want to ignore the theological undercurrent, and
enjoy the film as entertainment.  But that is just impossible.  The
story takes such an abrupt turn, that those expecting lighthearted,
fun entertainment will become bored.  And those looking for great
satire end up with muddled messages.  Perhaps the "happy ending"
syndrome that affects most Hollywood productions has infected this as
well.
That said, I am convinced that Joan Allen and William H. Macy give the
best performances in their careers.  They have impossible roles, of
being etched as charicatured ideal parents, slowly discovering their
individuality and sexuality.  Allen's Betty Parker is the consummate
homemaker who doesn't understand how unhappy and desperate she is.
Macy's George is the opposite, who's love of having dinner ready at
six is thrown into a tumult when that routine is upset.  Because of
them, the film has depth.
The other actors range from the standard (McGuire and Witherspoon) to
the downright embarrassing (Daniels and J.T. Walsh).  The film has
some clever bits--the "No Coloreds" theme is an act of genius.  But
these are not enough to compensate for the film.  All in all,
_Pleasantville_ has laughs, a good tone, an ingenius concept, and some
swell acting, soured by its own muddled, heavy-handed preaching.  Too
bad.
Now, which theatre owner will dare place this and _The Ice Storm_ on
its double-bill?

Author
Ted Prigge
Writer/Director: Gary Ross
Starring: Tobey Maguire, Reese Witherspoon, Joan Allen, William H. Macy,
Jeff Daniels, J.T. Walsh, Don Knotts, Paul Walker, Marley Shelton,
Marisa Ribisi, Jane Kaczmarek
"Pleasantville" is an amazing film, and it's incredibly philosophical
about life and all, but there's a couple things people have been looking
over.  They watch this film and they see that it deals with the complex
subject of change and looking strangely at the 50s ideal American Dream
of suburbia where everyone's happy and live without fear of conflict,
and although they think that the reason it's such a great film is
because it's philosophical, they're glossing over something else that's
there.  There always has to be something more than just philosophy to
make a piece of art great, even if what you're looking at is
Dostoevsky.  Reading "Crime and Punishment" is not a great read because
it expertly undlies humanity, but because it's a damn tense read that
shocks us with its major insights.
The makers of "Plesantville" have come up with a gimmick that is truly
ingenius.  As, the characters in this film go through major changes in
the way they see life, they change from black and white to color.  This
is the reason this film is great.  Director and writer Gary Ross has
found a way to convey not only the fact that they're changing but what
they're feeling like and what it must be like to everyone else in one
simple technique that to the audience is completely cinematic and
jaw-dropping.  Seeing the first red rose amongst a patch of otherwise
black and white flowers is nearly orgasmic.
"Pleasantville" is a simple film, filled with not only this gimmick, but
another one more that is commonly known as the "Fish Out of Water"
movie, and despite some clumsiness in this set-up, "Pleasantville" may
go down in cinema history as the best "Fish Out of Water" movie since
"Being There."  It deals with two modern-day teenage siblings, David and
Jennifer (Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon, respectively) - he's a
loser hermit who watches an old black and white 50s show called
"Pleasantville" with a passion; she's a cynical, slutty connioseur of
MTV and the like.  One night, when she has a date to watch a concert on
TV and he wants to watch the 24-hour "Pleasantville" marathon, they have
a fight over the remote control and break it.  A sinister-looking TV
repairman (played by none other than Don Knotts) shows up, gives them a
new remote, and when fighting over that one, they suddenly get sucked
into "Pleasantville."
Now, I don't know if anyone remembers the ill-fated sitcom from the
early 90s, "Honey, I'm Home" (where they imported a family from the 50s
and put them in the cynical 90s), but even if you do, don't worry
because after about 10 minutes, these two take off in different
directions.  Instead of staying with the overdone gimmick of "They're
from the 90s and now in the 50s!  How about that?!," which features
David and Jennifer trying to fit in at home (the parents are played to
perfection by William H. Macy and Joan Allen) and at school, and
discovering all the annoyances of living in perfection (they quickly
discovers nothing burns, it never rains, the fireman don't know what a
fire is, and there's not bathroom in those stalls), it instead takes off
questioning everything that has been put before them.
Starting with Jennifer teaching the captain of the basketball team (Paul
Walker) what should be done at Lover's Lane, a chain reaction is started
where most people learn about what else there is in life, and when they
do, they turn into color, while everything else is in black and white.
This actually robs the film of any real subtlety about its message,
making everything incredibly obvious, but it makes up for this in two
ways: 1) the gimmick of people changing never becomes tiresome, and is
always handled with originality and emotion; and 2) it actually adds on
top of that some real complications.
The world of "Pleasantville" is happy, and perpetually so, and only
changes when one person who has seen the difference and dislikes it
enough to do something about it.  But is it really a good thing that
these people changed, and complicated everything?  Wouldn't it be better
if everything was at peace and there was nothing wrong ever?  Gary Ross
says no, and the rest of this film is his argument.  Isn't the fact that
there are conflicts and suffering and the chance for happiness much
better than actual happiness?  Isn't the great thing about life that
things will not stay the same for any real length of time, and that you
always have to get used to living with something else?
The fact that Gary Ross explores all these angles is incredible, since
most films follow through on their subjects just so they can prove their
points.  "Pleasantville" shows the modern-day as cynical and
pessimistic, with chances of things only becoming worse.  The 50s, when
everything was seemingly perfect, is shown as the opposite of that, and
should theoretically be the ideal place to live in.  The changes, when
they happen, only bring out pain and suffering, resulting in a darker
second half, where the black and whites end up in a war against the
"colors," and book burning, prejudices, and social upheveal take hold.
But Ross says this is all worth it, just because when you suffer, you
finally see how free and grand life really is.
For this philosophical argument, I commend it, but that's really not why
it's great.  Sure, it says that life is worth living, but I'm much more
interested in the way this all comes about than rather what it says.
For me, "Plesantville" is worth multiple viewings just for those moments
when the colors pop up amidst the black and white photography.  I love
those moments when little things are color while the rest are still the
same.  And when instead of safe 50s ballads, Dave Brubeck and Miles
Davis creep onto the soundtrack.  And when the pages of the normally
blank books in the library fill up with words before our eyes.  There's
an intensely touching moment when the mother has learned about sex and
has turned to color, and asks David in confidence to put makeup on her
to hide up her transformation, and another moment that's nearly erotic
when the makeup is slowly taken off by someone else.  And my favorite
moment, when David and his new girlfriend drive from the black and white
road into Lover's Lane, where everything's vibrant colors, and then
later it rains for the first time.
Gary Ross has assembled an incredible cast of actors who aren't so
well-known but are all immensely talented, and everyone gives an
incredible performance, but there are some real standouts.  Tobey
Maguire is effortlessly lovable in the lead, as he always is, and Reese
Witherspoon is hysterical as the cynic who learns about real passion
from a D.H. Lawrence book (as we all did).  William H. Macy brings real
emotion and depth to his character, especially in the final moments of
the film, and Jeff Daniels, as the local sodajerk, comes off as sweet
and charmingly innocent.  In his final performance, J.T. Walsh
demonstrates exactly why he was great: because he was eerily prickly the
only he could be.  Joan Allen, though, looks like the one who would get
the Oscar nomination out of the lot.  She brings true emotion and
creativity to her role of the housewife who learns about passion early
on, and tries her best to deal with it, demonstrating that she may
possibly be the greatest actress in her age demographic working today.
But will anyone see it as nothing but a philosophical film, and an
unsubtle one at that?  I hope not, because it's one of those films that
is endlessly inventive and truly magical, in the tradition of the best
films of Frank Capra and even Victor Fleming (although some are
comparing it to "Back to the Future," it almost has as much magic as,
say, "The Wizard of Oz").  In years, people may reflect on this as the
film they nearly misunderstood for its greatness, but right now, it's
one of the best films to come out this year, just on the strength of how
happy it can make even the most pessimistic of the lot, and how it can
make the future look optimistic for a change.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Steve Rhodes
"Flashback to kinder, gentler times, this week on the 'TV Time'
network," goes the ad for the upcoming 24-hour marathon showing of that
hit black-and-white television series from the 1950s, "Pleasantville."
Writer and director Gary Ross, the writer and creator of BIG and DAVE,
delights audiences once again with his best fantasy ever in
PLEASANTVILLE.
David, played by Tobey Maguire from THE ICE STORM, is hands-down the
expert on "Pleasantville" trivia.  He has every line memorized from
every episode and plans to win the call-in contest during the marathon.
His twin sister, Jennifer, played by Reese Witherspoon from TWILIGHT,
thinks the whole idea is stupid.  She's more interested in boys and MTV.
Their teachers have been painting a bleak future for them, including
fewer job prospects, ecological disasters, famines and rising deaths
from AIDS.  Like most teens, they blow all of this off, worrying more
about their own popularity at school than the issues of the day.
Just before the big marathon, a mysterious TV repairman, played by
veteran actor Don Knotts, Barney Fife from  "The Andy Griffith Show,"
comes to the kid's house.  He gives them a high-powered remote control
that causes them to get sucked into the "Pleasantville" television show.
David and Jennifer are now Bud and Mary Sue (a.k.a. Muffin), and they
live in a black-and-white world.  Mary Sue looks at her arms, shrieking,
"I'm pasty!"
Reese Witherspoon delivers a dead-on performance as a sarcastic teen,
who is aghast to be thrown into the plastic 1950s.  She complains that
"We're, like, stuck in nerdville."  She wants out as quickly as possible
until a hunk, who is the captain of the basketball team, makes eyes at
her, following the script of the episode they are in to the letter.  The
captain is supposed to "pin" her that night.
The whole first half of the movie, as the kids cope and alter their new
environment, is comedy at its best.  Intelligently written, the film's
first part produces such a stream of laughter that you may need a second
viewing to catch all the spoken humor and sight gags.
Their milquetoast parents (Joan Allen as Betty Parker and William H.
Macy as George Parker) are a rigidly traditional couple.  Breakfast,
which is in danger of touching the ceiling, consists of stacks of dozens
of pancakes, waffles, and toast.  What constitutes a tragedy in this
family is George's "Honey, I'm home," not producing an instant hot
dinner.
Everything, absolutely everything, has always gone perfectly in
Pleasantville.  When the basketball team practices, every shot goes
through the hoop.  They've never lost a game, and there's no reason to
suspect they ever will.  People are adamantly polite to each other, and
their rituals are as set in concrete as a Latin mass.  Like most
television facades, there are a few things missing, like toilets in the
bathroom stalls and words in the books, but the townsfolk don't mind.
They are incapable of considering any alterations in their cosmos.
The school's geography lesson consists of reviewing the town's two main
streets.  When Mary Sue, with a faux pas of cataclysmic proportions,
asks what is outside of Pleasantville, the students have trouble even
comprehending the question since it is so silly.  ("There are some
places where the road doesn't go in circles, where the road keeps on
going," Bud will explain later to his entranced fellow students.)
David, as Bud, wants to play along with the series' rituals at all
costs, but Jennifer is dead set on shaking up the town by not following
her scripted part as Mary Sue.  She takes her boyfriend to lover's lane
and demonstrates to him its intended purpose.  Up until then, the kids
had gone there to hold hands from opposite sides of the car.  The movie
explores change through the power of reading as well as sex.
It is too bad that PLEASANTVILLE had to come out the same year as THE
TRUMAN SHOW since they will inevitably be compared.  Next to an almost
perfect film like THE TRUMAN SHOW, PLEASANTVILLE isn't as quite as good,
having many fewer memorable lines for one and lacking the talent of a
Jim Carrey for another, but this should not be allowed to detract from
the incredible brilliance of PLEASANTVILLE.
As dazzlingly filmed by John Lindley in a gorgeous black and white, the
movie slowly develops color in small places like roses and tongues,
until it bursts into a bouquet of saturated colors by the end.  (The
press kit explains that the film was actually shot in color.  In
postproduction they took out most of the color but left some of the
fleshtones in and increased the contrast.)
How and why things turn color is one of the mysteries that the story
slowly reveals.  At first the reason seems simple and almost trite, and
then the complete rationale behind the colorization becomes the story's
key turning point.  Visually it is a stunning technical achievement.
Once color appears in this innovative film, women's make-up is shown to
be able to take on an entirely different role.
Starting as a hilarious comedy, the story transforms carefully into a
serious satire on life's insanities.  Although it starts off as a romp,
the film ends up with more messages than you can count, all of them
delivered delicately but powerfully.
Part science fiction, the story asks the age-old question of what would
happen to the future if you could alter the past?  Moreover, would the
results be what you expect and want?  David worries about this a lot,
but Jennifer is more interested in freeing the people from their chains
and the consequences be damned.
The movie contains many great small performances.  Jeff Daniels plays a
soda jerk who comes unglued when he has to alter his routine even
slightly.  The late J.T. Walsh plays the mayor who fights hard to keep
the town's values unaltered.
The story has many surprises.  When there is a fire, for example, what
do you say to firemen who've never seen a fire, and who've spent their
entire lives rescuing cats?  You yell "Cat!" of course, since screaming
"Fire!" leaves them staring at you.
And what does it take to create a large, shocked and confused crowd at
the local Pleasantville furniture store?  Put a bed on display that is
twice the width of the standard issue single bed.  Unheard of.
PLEASANTVILLE runs 2:03.  It is rated PG-13 for sexuality, mature themes
and some profanity and would be fine for kids 12 and up.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   Everyone wants to be happy. But ask Americans what they
would need, realistically, to make them content and I'll bet a
majority would say a house with a white picket fence, and
dog and a couple of clean-cut kids.  This Father-Knows-Best,
Brady-Bunch, Ozzie-and-Harriet utopia is exactly what writer
Gary Ross unfolds in "Pleasantville": just an agreeable little
town that nobody leaves, one which is blissfully ignorant of
what may lie outside or cares to find out.  Who could blame
the people?  There are no graffiti, no drugs, no crime. 
Everyone looks about the same and has similar cultural and
political values.  Life is safe, secure, predictable, with dinner
on the table for all the husbands, wives perfectly content to
avoid the hassles of work and to stay at home, kids cheering
on a basketball team that never loses a game and never
even fails to sink a shot.  You might not expect such a movie
to be much more than a reflection of the predictability and
concomitant drabness of small-town America, but
"Pleasantville" is in fact a wonderfully entertaining work full of
easy-to-swallow social commentary.  It is a testament to the
power of the movies to maneuver the audience that this one
proves today's complex world--filled with AIDS, crime, drug-
addiction, global warming, terrorism, broken homes, and most
of all uncertainty--is to be preferred.  
   The Pleasantville of the title is like a town on Prozac: no
particular worries but then no color either. Photographed
largely in black-and-white to symbolize the placid, even keel
in which the residents live, "Pleasantville" boasts not only
tranquil relationship among its people but perfect climate as
well; as the weatherman reports, the temperature range is 72
high, 72 low, and not a cloud in the sky.
   How do we get to sample the wares?  Just find yourself a
TV repairman with mystical powers, as David (Tobey
Maguire) did one frantic evening as his sister Jennifer (Reese
Witherspoon) prepares for a hot date while David, an expert
on sitcom trivia, fixes to tune the TV to a contest that rewards
the participant with the most knowledge about a television
series called "Pleasantville."  David would likely fit right in
with those Americans who dream of utopia-with a-picket-
fence, as his family life is a mess.  He escapes
psychologically by immersing himself in the show, laughing
with the cornball situations, while chomping on his chips. 
When the remote control unit breaks down just before the
show, he is about to give up hope, but a strange-looking TV
repairman bounces in from the street to offer him a large
replacement for the crushed unit.  Turning on the set to
another episode, he and his sister are transported to the
home of George (William H. Macy) and his wife Betty (Joan
Allen), seamlessly taking the place of their teenaged children,
Bud and Mary Sue.  
   As an expert on the show, David knows exactly what is
going to happen and does not want to upset the stable lives
of the townspeople.  He is pushed to act the missionary from
the volatile world of the 1990's when his sexually active sister
seduces the captain of the basketball team, a tidy-cut fellow
who expect nothing more than hand-holding until he is to
begin going steady with a girl.  David's hands-off attitude
changes when he becomes appalled by the provincialism of
the citizens and is made to feel like a celebrity when he is
cornered everywhere by peers who want to know everything
about the great big world that they scarcely knew existed.  He
develops a particularly poignant relationship with a soda-
fountain waiter, Mr. Johnson (Jeff Daniels), who is in mortal
fear of doing anything--even preparing a cheeseburger or
shutting the front door--in any manner but the one to which
he is accustomed; and to Betty Parker (Joan Allen) who, as
George's wife does not even know what she is missing until
her "son" David clues her in on the nature of imaginative sex.
   To that point director Gary Ross plays it safe, providing an
amusing comedy with little social gravity.  The second part of
the film--like Robert Benigni's "Life is Beautiful"--turns into
heartfelt social commentary which quite effectively points up
the evils that can result when the powers-that-be are
threatened by changes.  When husbands no longer can be
assured of dinner, when older men and women are
confronted with a frank, artistic exhibitions of nudity
decorating the luncheonette walls, when kids patronize a
library and learn about life on their own, the inflamed men
and women resort to fascist procedures like bookburning,
window-smashing, and overt denigration of all things that
upset their vision of a placid life.
   Ross's cinematic techniques are every bit a match for his
observations on the nature of humanity.  Each time a resident
becomes the slightest bit liberated--when a boy or girl
discovers the joys of sex, when a housewife devoted
exclusively to the care of others begins to find pleasure in her
own body, when a hitherto homespun individual discovers the
beauty of fine painting--they turn from black-and-white to
color, which is Ross's way of approving their willingness to
confront the pluckier aspects of life.  With an implicit nod to
Aristotle and his theory of the golden mean, he even shows
that the sexy, cool Jennifer cannot herself be released from a
black-and-white existence until she develops an attraction for
books, study, and a more placid way of life than that which
she has been customarily devoted.  While Ross gets good
supporting roles from William H. Macy as the man of the
house, Joan Allen as his devoted but ultimately dissatisfied
wife and J.T. Walsh as the leader of a right-wing group
determined to suppress freedom, he is blessed by a grand
work of young Tobey Maguire as a natural leader of a
Babbitt-like community determined to free it from shackles it
never knew it wore.  Psychoanalyst Erich Fromm, whose
masterwork "Escape from Freedom" holds that there is
nothing people fear more than emancipation from their own
manacles, would have loved this marvelously entertaining and
uplifting piece of filmmaking.

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: October 23, 1998
Starring: Tobey Maguire, Jeff Daniels, Reese Witherspoon, Joan Allen,
William H. Macy, J.T. Walsh, Don Knotts
Directed by: Gary Ross
Distributed by: New Line Cinema
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (some thematic elements emphasizing sexuality,
language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/pleasant.htm
If there's one thing in common about all of Hollywood's major studios,
it's that their productions are moving toward mainstream more and more.
Although Twentieth Century Fox and New Line Cinema have spawned
subsidiaries which specialize in independant or controversial motion
pictures (Fox Searchlight and Fine Line respectively), it's obvious
there's no significant movement underway to promote inventive ideas at
the theater. So when a movie like Gary Ross' PLEASANTVILLE comes along,
wrapped in a blanket of innovative ideas and served up on a platter of
fine production, it's a welcome change of pace for all who frequent the
cineplexes. 
Although the atmosphere and buzz about the movie are cheery and
lighthearted, PLEASANTVILLE should not be mistaken for a no-thought
movie. Quite the opposite is true, in fact, as Director Ross skillfully
brings a narrative with intense and intelligent undertones to the
screen. The story, both about the joys of living life to the fullest as
well as the social ills of segregation, captures the essence of
statement-making in the cinema. Not in recent memory has a movie carried
such weight of theme into widescale distribution, and even if mass
audiences fail to see the ingenuity of Ross' work, it is still a
testament that his picture was considered worthy enough. Kudos to both
he and his production staff for putting together this fine picture. 
It stars Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon as two nineties teenagers
who, through quite a bit of luck, find themselves zapped into a fifties
sitcom named "Pleasantville." Maguire, as the reserved Bud Parker, is
perfect for the pseudo-world; but the rebellious Mary Sue (Witherspoon)
is not at all made for the father-knows-best times. It's not long before
she sets the town of Pleasantville on end, and begins to teach the
townspeople - in a quite unlikely way - what life is *really* like. Soon
hues of color creep into the black and white world, and while some
embrace the change in the passion of realism, others fear the
strangeness. At one end is a soda shop owner-turned-painter named Mr.
Johnson (Jeff Daniels) and at the other end is a close-minded mayor
(J.T. Walsh) and his chamber of commerce; but the two sides are simply
fronts for a clash of ideas that soon involves the entire town. 
Fine performances are turned in all around. Maguire and Witherspoon are
effective as the leads, but the true complements go out to Jeff Daniels
and J.T. Walsh (in his latest and final posthumous performance). Daniels
brings an atmosphere of awe, inspiration, and hope to his character,
whereas Walsh simply drips of sinister closemindedness - almost to the
point where you can sense Gene Hackman's envy. For Daniels, it's his
most commendable performance of the last three years - or more - and for
Walsh, it's a complementary exclamation point on a fine career. Also of
lesser note is the supporting role by Joan Allen, and in viewing the
entire cast works well together from start to finish. There's not much
to dislike about PLEASANTVILLE, and its dynamic nature makes it the
perfect movie for those who want serious as well as those who don't.

Author
Steve Kong
Of the films I love, there are the good, the great, and the Pleasantvilles.
Pleasantville is a movie that says many things but never gets preachy. The
film draws you in from the start.
As the film starts, a barrage of television images hits us, as if we're
channel surfing with someone who hasn't found anything interesting to watch
yet. The frantic channel surfing finally stops at a family channel, which
features 50s TV shows. You know the type of shows, the ones that are
wholesome and good for the entire family. These are the shows that some
politicians want the world to be like, the shows that have "family values."
We find out that we were channel surfing with David (Tobey Maguire) who has
no social life and is pleasantly referred to as a "nerd" by his cooler
sister, Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon). Jennifer is a girl who strives to be
cool: she acts like a slut, she doesn't read, and tonight she has a hot
date. David also has a hot date tonight: his is with a TV show marathon.
The TV show is called Pleasantville and the marathon has a trivia contest
with a cash prize of $1000. David is a big Pleasantville buff and can
answer any question about any episode of the show. He's ready to win.
David and Jennifer fight over the remote and it is torn to pieces. A
friendly TV repairman (Don Knotts) replaces the remote with a strange
looking one. After the repairman leaves, the fight for the TV remote is on
again - that is until David pushes the wrong button on the remote and both
he and Jennifer are sent directly into Pleasantville.
Pleasantville, the movie, is not the story of David and Jennifer trying to
escape from the TV show, though it starts out this way. Pleasantville is
the story of David and Jennifer trying to live and adapt in a world that is
black and white and has the same "family values" that everyone is now
talking about. Writer/director Gary Ross doesn't get preachy with this
theme, but he doesn't let the theme slip away either. 
The movie has the underlying message that there were flaws in those 50s
family values, and we should be careful in wishing for those times again.
With all the problems of the 90s, this is definitely the better place to
live. Sure, it's nice for a husband to come home at 6 pm, say, "Honey, I'm
home", and be seated fifteen minutes later to a hot dinner with the family.
But, how is it for the wife who spends the day slaving over the stove? Is
that what we really want today? Would this really work? Once changed,
things cannot easily change back, as David observes. David's Pleasantville
Mom (Joan Allen) finds this out early on when Jennifer teaches her what sex
is and then what she can do if Dad (William H. Macy) doesn't want to have
sex. This, like the other radical ideas that David and Jennifer inject into
this once stable community, starts the people thinking. The ideas that
David and Jennifer spread help the people of Pleasantville break out of
their "normal" lives into something more exciting.
The one thing wonderful about Pleasantville is how the movie slowly
transitions from a black and white to color. The special effects in the
movie work hand in hand with the story to the extent that we are left to
ponder why some of the Pleasantville citizens are in color and why others
remain black and white. From the first showing of color, the special
effects team has put a sense of awe into the movie. There is nothing more
spectacular than a bright red rose set on a black and white background. As
the movie progresses, more and more colors start to saturate the film.
Kudos to the special effects team at The Computer Film Company for making
Pleasantville so colorful.
The two lead performers in Pleasantville, Maguire and Witherspoon, are
excellent. Witherspoon handles her switch, from slut to smart, very well.
Maguire is subtle but good.
The two performances that stick out as great are those of Joan Allen and
William H. Macy. The scene where Allen gets to show off is a scene with
Maguire in which she is in color and is forced to find a way to cover up
the color that she likes. This is a scene that left the theatre silent,
except for some sobbing. Macy is a character actor who is at the top of his
game, no matter what. I loved the scene in which Macy comes home, puts his
jacket and suitcase down, hangs up his hat and cries out - like regular -
"Honey, I'm home!" only to find that his wife is not there. "Where's my
dinner?" he asks plaintively, many times, before resigning himself to the
fact that his life has changed forever.
Gary Ross, who wrote the touching film Big, debuts as a director with
Pleasantville. And he proves that he can write a good script and then turn
it into a brilliant realization on film. Ross's script is laced with enough
to plug up holes, which might have shown up if the script was written a
less talented person. For instance, the geography class doesn't learn about
"world" geography. There is no "world" in Pleasantville; the whole world
lives on Main Street. When asked where Main Street ends, the teacher simply
answers that the end of Main Street is the beginning. Kudos to Ross for
putting together Pleasantville.
Pleasantville is a Don't Miss film. Pleasantville makes us think,
entertains us, inspires us, and makes us laugh. There aren't many films
that can do all of this. Don't Miss Pleasantville - if there is just one
movie you see this year, see Pleasantville.
 recipe for a hard boiled review:  one egg, two cups water, a pot,
 a helluva attitude, and a guy who loves the cinema.
 i'm your hard boiled movie guide.

Author
Edwin Jahiel
PLEASANTVILLE *** 1/2 . Written and directed by Gary Ross. Photography,
John Lindley. Editing, William Goldenberg.Production designer, Jeannine
Oppewall. Art director, Dianne Wager. Set decorator, Jay Hart.Costumes,
Judianna Makovsky. Music director, Randy Newman. Produced by Ross, Jon
Kilik, Robert J. Degus, Steven Soderbergh.Cast: Tobey Maguire (David/Bud),
Jeff Daniels (Johnson), Joan Allen (Betty), William H. Macy (George), J.T.
Walsh (Big Bob), Don Knotts (TV Repairman), Marley Shelton (Margaret), Jane
Kaczmarek (David's Mom), Reese Witherspoon (Jennifer/Mary Sue).A New Line
release. 116 minutes. PG-13.
Simplify, simplify! Exaggerate, exaggerate!  Combine those strategies with
skill and imagination and you can get immediate, public-pleasing results in
comedy and satire. That's what happens in the case of "Pleasantville," the
aptly and ironically named first feature by Gary Ross, the co-writer of the
fantasy "Big," and the writer of the fanciful, political "Dave."
It is crystal-clear that Pleasantville is going to become a popular
mega-hit and that just about all regular filmgoers know what to expect.
Even so:
Siblings David and Jennifer are high-school seniors in 1998 and in an
unnamed town They share the problem of an unhappily divorced mother and the
problem of people their age. At a school assembly, the students are given a
pessimistic report on the future: unemployment, AIDS, environmental
disasters, etc. (This is not a gratuitous announcement, since its aim is to
incite good grades that can make the difference in an increasingly
competitive society).
Dave and Jennifer may be twins but have different personalities. The girl
is what, way back when, used to be called "boy-crazy." Her brother takes
refuge from the (presumed) unpleasantnesses of life by watching cable
reruns of old, 1950s family-type sitcoms. An expert in the series
"Pleasantville," he is about to enter and undoubtedly win  the $1.000 first
prize in a contest  about "Pleasantville."
The two kids, following a nicely planned succession of events, and via a
mysteriously appearing TV repairman, find themselves transported to and
inside the "Pleasantville" sitcom, as the characters Dave and Mary Sue, the
children of the impossibly neat and idealized (by 1950's standards pushed
beyond their outer limits) household of Betty and George.
We are now in a Twilight Zone territory, but without that program's
darkness -- at least not overtly. Getting from reality to fantasy also
reminds me of the way Orpheus (in Jean Cocteau's eponymous film) goes to
another world by entering a mirror.
"Pleasantville" reflects mores and manners of many a 50's sitcom, only
taken to the limit. The opening, establishing scenes of the movie proper
are in color. Set in April 1958, the program's world is, unsurprisingly,
shown in black and white and shades of gray. What is surprising is that its
world is strictly limited to the falsely "ideal," town of Pleasantville.
There is nothing beyond its Main Street, which, reaching its end, loops
back to its beginning. It is like those images of a coiled snake  biting
its own tail.
There is no history. There are no books, or rather, there are book covers
of some major works but the pages inside are blank. The high school has a
winning basketball team where everyone scores baskets. One may wonder which
other teams they play. Or where anything --no, make this everything else,
from clothes to cars to meat --you-name it, comes from. But then
"Pleasantville" requires blind, and willing, suspension of disbelief!
The sitcom is sanitized to the nth power. This goes beyond pristine picked
fences, manicured lawns and perfectly surfaced streets, streets that you
could fry the proverbial eggs on, except that the year-round temperature is
72 high, 72 low and never a cloud in sight. (How do they know what clouds
are? Never mind). Not only are there no bathrooms mentioned, but Mary Sue's
attempt to find one results in an room tiled and empty.
At a good clip, Mary Sue and Bud affect the place from A to Z. Since they
"belong" in the sitcom, no one sees them, as we do, like those wiser
extra-terrestrials of sci-fi flicks. So what they say and do is not
questioned. Mary Sue gradually makes the sexual education of the youths,
and, indeed, her own mother, in a neat reversal of the child teaching her
mom the facts of life. Bud opens new doors, to art, to books (that have a
content now), to feelings.
Among other transformations there is that of Mr. Johnson (Jeff Daniels),
who seems to be a dimwit soda jerk until Bud, aware that Johnson has the
repressed soul of an artist, releases it by opening his eyes with the gift
of a coffee-table art book. If you use logic, you'll wonder where the book
came from; and how its reproductions of paintings, from old to very modern,
can affect so strongly a total visual illiterate. But the name of the game
with this film is never to ask questions!
In another reversal, the local firemen do not put out fires, since these do
not exist. Nor do they set fires, as they did in Ray Bradbury's (and
Francois Tuffaut's) cautionary "Fahrenheit 451." They only know how to
rescue cats from high branches.
Gradually, as the people of Pleasantville begin to change, feel and see new
things, humans, objects, and nature go from black-and-white to beautiful
colors. The colorizing does not, as a rule, affect the entire image but is
applied to one item within it while the main view of the screen remains in
black and white. Color shows up in often unexpected, symbolic places. The
process is beautifully thought out and timed, superbly executed with
digital techniques taken farther than in any film I can remember. Along
with the invasions of color, natural phenomena such as rain also appear.
The first half of the movie is a delight, especially if you bear in mind
that what it spoofs to the max is not really the life of the 1950s but life
in certain 1950's TV programs. There is, however, a limit to one- or
two-joke stories. The film's second part becomes increasingly like a view
of 1950's society seen by militant eyes of the 1960s. The development  revs
up its parables, takes us into matters concerning reactionary
socio-politics, the mistrust of "the other" and of non-conformism, racism,
suppression of ideas (down to a Nazi-ish book burning), fear of
differences, and so on.
Things become a bit laborious. The underlying idea that change is good and
inevitable, is a good one. Potshots at the 50s icons are supplemented by
sometimes overt, sometimes subtler ironies about the 1990's. They imply
that today trends, fads and above all conformism are, under various guises,
not unlike those of 40 years ago. It is a sound notion to suggest that in
the 90s we can be as self-centered or obscurantist as the Pleasantvillers.
But the movie might have condensed all this and made its points in under
116 minutes.
Still, I cannot give too much weight to this objection since this
elaboration, dotting of the i's and crossing of the t's, is better than the
ponderously encapsulated didacticism that opens and closes the Twilight
Zone's episodes. Pleasantville-the-movie has well-meaning allegorical
ambitions, as well as a very tricky and a highly imaginative structure
surrounding its exaggerations and simplifications.
It also has, with no exceptions, a splendid cast that can be touching
(especially the characters played by Joan Allen and Jeff Daniels),
serio-comic (the siblings), oddly pathetic (William H. Macy, and the
smartly conceived heavy, J.T. Walsh in his last role).
Above all, it is infinitely more original and inventive than the
pedestrian, copycat movies that make up the great majority of what goes on
screens small and large, in this our time.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Author
Michael Redman
"Pleasant". Now there's a word that's a double-edged sword. It used to mean an
agreeable experience, but during the past couple of years I've been hearing it
used differently. Occasionally when I've heard someone refer to a pleasant
time, what they really mean is "uninteresting". Nothing unexpected. Safe.
Twin teens David (Tobey Maguire) and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon) live with
their divorced mom and are inundated with the troubles of the nineties. There
is no hope. There are no good jobs. AIDS is killing off the population. The
ozone is being depleted. They both cope in a time-honored tradition: they
ignore the problems. Jennifer is a party girl out for a good time. David
retreats into the safe world of reruns of "Pleasantville", a fifties sitcom.
While arguing over television - David is set to watch a "Pleasantville"
marathon, Jennifer has a hot date coming over to watch an MTV concert -- they
break the remote control. Almost immediately a peculiar TV repairman (Don
Knotts) shows up with a new super-powered remote. Instead of changing
channels, it transports them into the program. You can almost hear eerie music
and Rod Serling's voice, "There's a signpost up ahead. You are entering Pleasantville."
The television series is modeled after "The Donna Reed Show", "Father Knows
Best" and other sanitized family comedies popular during the late fifties and
early sixties. David and Jennifer find themselves taking the place of Bud and
Mary Sue and living with TV parents George (William H. Macy) and Betty (Joan
Allen). Having no choice, they pretend to belong.
Exploring the town, they discover that the black and white Pleasantville is a
little odd. The weather forecast is always the same ("High of 72, low of 72,
sunny skies"), there is no sex, nothing ever changes and the basketball team
never misses a shot. Everything is just too darned nice.
Jennifer changes all that when she seduces her boyfriend at lover's lane. He
doesn't have any idea what is going on. She reassures him with "Don't worry.
It's supposed to do that." Driving home afterwards he notices something
strange. A single rose in an otherwise monochromatic world is now a brilliant red.
Soon word of the new invention spreads like wildfire and the high school kids
are going to it like crazed weasels. Colors start sprouting everywhere. Skin
tones take on a rosy hue rather than pasty gray.
David brings a book of art prints to Mr. Johnson (Jeff Daniels), his boss at
the malt shop. Johnson is blown away by the magnificence of the colors and is
soon painting up a storm. There's no stopping now. A change is gonna come.
The film is filled with about a thousand metaphors. The most obvious mirrors
the transformation of society in the fifties. Scarred by the depression, World
War II and the threat of the bomb, Americans wanted to put themselves to sleep
for a while. Television illustrated that desire. Father did know best. If
there was a minor problem, it could be resolved by having a little talk with
the Beaver.
Meanwhile out in the real world, this wasn't exactly the case. Racism, poverty
and minority rights were looming on the horizon. Elvis and James Dean were
lurking in the shadows, ready to wake the country up.
On a more personal level, the movie is about individual choices between
mediocrity and adventure. At first the colorizing seems trite: get laid and
everything looks better. Then we find that it's not sex that brightens up the
world. It's passion for life.
Especially telling is Betty's experience. After Mary Sue explains to her "mom"
what sex is, Betty experiences her first orgasm in a bathtub of warm water. A
tree outside bursts into flames.
Although energized, Betty doesn't want anyone to know. She uses gray make-up
to cover her now-pink skin. She knows what life is about but wants to "pass"
as normal and lead the proverbial life of quiet desperation because it's
safer. Later she can no longer resist. When told not to worry, her color will
go away, she replies emphatically "I don't want it to go away."
The film made me squirm in my seat. The effects are handled beautifully with
little patches of surreal color appearing in otherwise black and white scenes.
The actors are all fine with Macy and Allen as particular stand-outs. But I
kept waiting for the film to delve deeper into its theme. Unfortunately it
never gets far below the surface.
The sequence of events is predicable. Kids, artists and women awaken to a new
vivid reality and want to change things. The men in power are frightened and
fight back.
Director and writer Gary Ross hits us over the head with heavy-handed
messages. A store window sign reads "No Coloreds". There's a book-burning. The
Chamber Of Commerce look like Nazis.
The adults of the fifties knew better than to believe the simplistic
television shows. Their kids, on the other hand, may have fallen for them. The
first generation growing up with the little glowing screen as a family member
were indoctrinated by those programs. Even as adults, children of the fifties
find it difficult to shake that early message that if you do things right,
life will be easy.
Perhaps the best line in the film comes when David is consoling his real
mother who is in tears. Echoing a statement that has come out of almost every
Baby Boomer's mouth, she cries, "I'm 40. Life isn't supposed to be like this!"
"Mom," he explains, "there is no way life is _supposed_ to be."
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and is still
searching for just the right mix of pleasant and that other stuff.)
[This appeared in the 11/5/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Homer Yen
If you ever tune into Nick at Nite, it's likely that you'll catch some
of those classic tv programs that espoused nothing but heaps of family
values.  Remember Make Room for Daddy or the Brady Bunch or Leave It
To Beaver?  Everything was 'swell', a heated romance consisted of
holding hands, and it never rained.  Pleasantville is another one of
those shows featuring a never-ending string of smiles and homemade
chocolate chip cookies.  
Dave is a big fan of this program and has uncanny knowledge of each
and every episode.  He is especially excited to learn that they'll be
having a Pleasantville marathon on tv.  But this doesn't bode well
with Jen, his outgoing and popular sister.  An important date is
coming over and she wants to watch MTV.  As they struggle for the
remote, a surge of energy transports them into Pleasantville in a
Twilight Zone-esque sort of way.   Now, they become Bud and Mary Sue,
children in an all-too-perfect family and residents of an
all-too-perfect community.  What's worse, their whole world is in
black and white.
They have little choice but to go along with what's happening while
they try to figure a way out of this unlikely universe.  Bud/Dave
wants to play it safe and uses his knowledge of the episodes to make
sure that the universe remains unchanged.  When the Captain of his
basketball team asks him a question, for example, he knows what will
happen in the near future because he's already seen the episode. 
However, Mary Sue/Jen completely dislikes the sterile environment. 
"We are stuck in Nerdville," she exclaims and intends to inject a
little life into the community.   However, by stirring things up,
things begin to change.  She introduces into this staid environment
shocking, never-before experienced feelings such as passion.  Bud/Dave
objects at first but then realizes that this newfound sense of
existence begins to start a revolution.  A renaissance of emotion is
underway.  For those that feel it, their lives are rewarded with color
and an imagination that they could never before attain.  However, some
want to keep Pleasantville in its original state. This situation
divides the community, and it is up to Bud/Dave to find a way for the
townsfolk to embrace this new transformation.
"Pleasantville" has many niceties.  At its core, it's a movie about
discovery.  It's sends out a nice message that promotes freedom to
explore and to take risks.  It paces itself well as the local citizens
slowly make their own discoveries of who they are and of the world
around them.  It's not a movie that will make you kick your heels when
you walk out of the theatre.  But the movie does live up to its name.


Author
Mark R. Leeper
     CAPSULE: Smug and self-congratulatory allegory introduces popular
1990s values to the world of the 1950s TV situation comedy and causes a
revolution.  Two 90s teens fall into the world of a 1950s situation
comedy.  Some major logic flaws.  Rating: 6 (0 to 10), high +1 (-4 to
+4)
   - Well-made (albeit wrongheaded) fantasy about two teenagers who are
     given a magic remote control unit and are pulled into the world of
     "Pleasantville," an amiable television situation comedy.  They
     find themselves actually in Pleasantville with only the memory of
     episodes from the series to guide them.  The world is in black and
     white.  When the teens introduce sex and passion to a passionless
     world, objects and even people start transforming to Technicolor.
     White male power structure wants to stop the revolution of
     feelings.
   - Jeff Daniels as soda jerk who wants to be a painter.  Theme bears
     some relation to his THE PURPLE ROSE OF CAIRO.
   - Our world of the 1990s is seen as being ridden with unemployment,
     global warming, and AIDS.  Pleasantville seems to be a more
     pleasant place to live, but it is quickly found not to be.
   - Computer graphics to partially colorize scenes.  Only those
     objects (especially people) who are fulfilled are in color.  (I
     wonder what Roger Ebert makes of that?)
   - Don Knotts as magical TV repairman.
   - How can passionless people riot and remain passionless?
   - Film cannot decide if it is against 50s values or just 50s values
     as seen on TV.
   - Film pessimistic about AIDS but it is positive on the sexual
     revolution assuming that sex brings fulfillment.
   - There were some serious topic even on FATHER KNOWS BEST.  This is
     not an accurate view of 50s TV.
   - How pleasant to see white males standing in the way of the sexual
     revolution rather than being the ones who are sex-crazed!  But
     that is, of course, so that they are the villains even here.
   - If whole world is Pleasantville, where does pineapple come from?
     Where does the gas station get its gasoline?
   - Visual tribute to TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD's courtroom scene.
   - First half of the film is considerably better than the second half
     which is full of all sorts of self-satisfied assumptions that
     1990s have things working a lot better than the 1950s.  While
     claiming that no decade has things right, the film provincially
     assumes that the 1990s has things a lot better than the 1950s.

Author
Marty Mapes
*** (out of 4) Pleasantville is that rare movie that is
thought-provoking without being substantive. It's a parable without a
meaning. A metaphor without a referent. It's enjoyable and stimulating,
but it's not as deep as it leads you to believe.
David (Tobey Maguire) is a high school nerd. His greasy black hair is
the perfect complement to his encyclopedic knowledge of TV Trivia. He
has clearly grown up with Nick at Night, and his favorite show is
Pleasantville, a combination of Father Knows Best and Leave It To
Beaver.
His sister Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon) wants to watch the MTV concert
with her boyfriend one evening, but David wants to watch the
Pleasantville marathon so he can enter the trivia contest. 
Their fight results in a broken remote control, without which the TV
will not function. Coincidentally, a mysterious TV repair man (Don
Knotts) shows up at their door with a super duper remote control.
The repairman is so impressed by David's knowledge of Pleasantville
trivia that he leaves them the remote free of charge. David clicks the
remote and he and Jennifer suddenly find themselves in Pleasantville.
They are now trapped in the sanitary, black-and-white "utopia" of 1950s
sitcoms. David and Jennifer are now "Bud" and "Mary Sue," at least until
they can find that repairman again.
David knows this universe pretty well and he is able to cope with the
change. Living in utopia and having a knowable, predictable future is
actually something "Bud" is looking forward to.
In contrast, Jennifer is angry and resentful. She accepts that the
universe around her has changed, but she's not going to play along with
it. When she finally makes it to school, she introduces the word "cool"
to her friends as a substitute for "swell." When she gets bored (which
doesn't take too long) she seduces Mary Sue's boyfriend (who's never
done more than hold hands with a girl) in the back seat of his car.
Her boyfriend had never heard of sex before (this IS the land where
married couples sleep five feet apart on single beds). So when he
experiences it for the first time, a rose appears in full, vivid, living
color. The next day he tells his friends about the experience and soon,
everyone is having sex and seeing real colors.
The universe as the inhabitants of Pleasantville know it shatters. Mr.
Johnson (Jeff Daniels) who runs the soda shop learns about free will the
hard way. Firemen learn about fires. Students learn about books. Boys
learn about girls and girls learn about boys. With each revelation comes
a new splash of color into the black and white world.
It seems as though modern ideas are so strong that they are unstoppable.
But after about half of the townspeople pop into full color,
Pleasantville hits a plateau. Some residents just don't like or
understand what is happening. They cling to their old-fashioned black
and white ways, and they don't experience the colorful epiphanies their
friends and families had.
Some people without color resent these changes that they can't control,
so they resort to prejudice and violence. The movie hits its climax with
Bud's trial in a colorless courtroom with colorless jurors and a fearful
colorless judge.
Although I enjoyed this film, I was ultimately disappointed that this
elaborate parable had so little meaning. The only apparent lesson is
that change - exciting to some and feared by others - is inevitable.
Lots of other lessons take shape, but when you think about them too
hard, they dissolve.
For example, it seems that passion sparks the change from black and
white to color. If true, it would lead to all sorts of interesting
conclusions about what the movie was trying to say. Later, an angry mob
smashes a store window and none of them change color. The film now says
that passion has to be "good" in order to effect the change to color. It
leads to a different set of ideas about the film. Still later in the
film, one of the last black and white holdouts changes color by
confronting his own hatred. The film once again changes its own rules,
leaving one to wonder if there really was supposed to be a metaphor at
work.
(NOTE: Gary Ross responded to this question in Ebert's "Answer Man"
column. Nevertheless, that's not a resource available to you when you're
sitting in the theater.)
I was also disappointed that this movie avoided some of the bigger
issues that could have made it really interesting. For example, when the
town is split, the black-and-whites are not given equal time. The film
doesn't let the audience see their point of view. It ignores the
deep-down terror they must feel at watching their world collapse. Why
weren't there any black-and-white suicides? What if the last one were
unable to change? Would the new colorful world have a place for these
leftovers, or would they become Pleasantville's forgotten homeless?
Finally, Ross let the film have an all-too-easy outcome. Conventional
storytelling doesn't let Utopia come without some cost. Utopia is too
boring or sterile to be one's permanent residence, or it requires some
sacrifice the characters aren't willing to make. Yet by the end of the
film, not only has everyone become colorful, the world is still free of
crime, rape, violence, and presumably toilets. A little turmoil in the
middle allowed the world of Pleasantville to become a true utopia, and
that usually isn't allowed in fiction. (Even more unconventional is that
Jennifer's decision at film's end is allowed to stand!)
Both before and during the movie, I was rooting to be won over, and I
actually enjoyed the experience. But it turns out my expectations were
too high. I saw that Ross was searching for human Truths, but the whole
thing fell apart in my head not long after the movie was over.
Still, I did enjoy it and it was worth thinking about outside the
theater, if only for an hour. That still lets me recommend this film.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Ryan Davis
        When I watch Nick at Night, I laugh at the simplicity of the old TV
shows. Shows like `Leave It to Beaver' [1957-1963], and `The Andy Griffin
Show' [1960-1968] really made life look downright pleasant, or is it?
        David (Tobey Maguire), a high school student, is a huge fan of a
fifties television show called Pleasantville. One day in preparation for a
Pleasantville marathon, he and his sister, Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon) get in
a fight over what to watch on television. During the brief fight, they break
the television remote. Magically and without warning, a television repairman
(Don Knotts) appears and gives them a new remote control. With the press of a
button David and Jennifer are actually transported into Pleasantville.
        The two teens are instantly given a new family and a new life in the
entirely black and white town. Their new parents are delightful fifties
stereotypes. The father (William H. Macy) works all day to provide for the
family, and bowls with his friends in the evening. The mother (Joan Allen)
cooks and cleans all day and always has dinner ready for her husband when he
comes home from work.
        Pleasantville, at first glance, appears to be paradise. Upon further
study, they find a world infected with censorship and oppression. Things
begin to change in Pleasantville, and the citizens that break free of the
usual monotony are changed from black and white into color. These `coloreds'
are looked upon as weaker people, and are banned from stores and are outcast
in the black and white community. The film continues on as David and Jennifer
discover that maybe the `good old days,' are not as good as they seemed to
be.
        The movie, itself, is visually stunning and quite beautiful. The way
that black and white is mixed with color is simply brilliant. I wouldn't be
surprised if Pleasantville was nominated for art and cinematography Oscars.
        The acting is also great. Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon do a
great job in their leading roles. Although it is really the terrific
supporting performances by William H. Macy, Joan Allen, the late J.T. Walsh,
Jeff Daniels, and the perfectly cast Don Knotts, that propel this film. The
leads have the most screen time, but they are nowhere near as interesting as
the characters each of these actors play.
        Pleasantville is an incredibly symbolic movie. In fact, it is far too
symbolic. Instead of concentrating on one or even two topics, it spreads
itself far to thin. After only one screening I noticed references to Nazism,
Racism, Individualism, Christianity, Judaism, Communism, Socialism and more.
With so much taking place it becomes almost muddled and unclear.
        Pleasantville runs a little over two hours long and it feels like
more. While some of the scenes are incredible, some seem to add absolutely
nothing to the story. Better editing would have made this movie much more
enjoyable.
Pleasantville still manages to be entertaining, and at least interesting to
watch. While it is about 20 minutes to long it is still rather humorous,
thought provoking, and contains a number of great performances.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
STARRING:   William H. Macy, Joan Allen, Tobey Maguire, Reese
                Witherspoon, Jeff Daniels, J.T. Walsh
DIRECTOR:   Gary Ross
WRITER:     Gary Ross
RATED:      PG-13 (for adult language and potentially disturbing
YEAR:       1998
SEEN AT:    Park Place 16, Morrisville NC
        "Don't judge a book by its cover" has long been the
motto of enlightened readers, who recognize that the story
contained within the pages of a novel often bears no
resemblance to the illustration on the front.  I'd like to
take this concept a step further and propose a new maxim for
moviegoers: "Don't judge a film by its trailer."
        Movie trailers (the "previews" which run before the
main feature) have been used to promote upcoming films for
almost as long as movies have been around.  Their job is a
simple one: entice the audience back to the theater at a
future date, just as a book cover's job is to get you to buy
the novel you're leafing through.  But beware: like all forms
of advertising, trailers often stretch the truth a bit.
"Chasing Amy," a thought-provoking comedy/drama from director
Kevin Smith, was depicted as a happy-go-lucky "bimbo" movie by
Miramax's ads.  And if I didn't see new movies as a matter of
course, I would have skipped "Dance with Me," a warm, rich
drama full of life and energy, because the trailer painted the
film as two hours of Vanessa Williams shaking her tushie while
Kris Kristofferson stood around, looking confused.  The
trailers for "The Truman Show" and "Ransom" are equally bad...
though the ads for "Pleasantville" aren't far behind in terms of
quality.  (Joe's trivia question for the day: why are movie
ads called "trailers" when they run BEFORE the movie?  Answer
given at the end of this review.)
        As anyone who's seen the trailer can tell you,
"Pleasantville" revolves around two modern teenagers, David
(Tobey Maguire) and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon), who are
magically transported into the fictional world of David's
favorite television show, a Mayberry-esque community called
Pleasantville.  The year is 1958, the weather is always
perfect, the universe (including David and Jennifer) is in
black and white, Perry Como rules the airwaves, and dinner
is always on the table when "Dad" (William H. Macy) gets home
from work.  David is delighted to be living in a simpler
time, but wild-child Jennifer is aghast at the lack of sex,
cigarettes and MTV... and decides to impart some of her
worldly knowledge to the citizens of the town.
        Jennifer's actions have unforeseen ramifications,
however: as she (and David, to a lesser extent) encourage the
other citizens of the town to change and evolve, the former
idyllic paradise of Pleasantville is rocked to its foundation.
The basketball team no longer wins every game.  "Mom" suddenly
doesn't feel like making dinner for "Dad" every night.  Teenagers
discover other things to do in the bushes besides hold hands.
Rock and roll (gasp!) becomes the music of choice.  And, for the
first time ever, REAL COLOR begins to appear in the town...
sporadically at first, but with increasing frequency, sending
mayor Bob (the wonderful J.T. Walsh, who died during the making
of the film) into a deep panic.
        The trailer gives the impression that the movie is a
screwball comedy, but make no mistake: "Pleasantville" is a
drama, and a damn fine one at that.  Sure, there are several
funny moments: the Pleasantville Fire Department are experts at
getting cats out of trees, but seem woefully unequipped to deal
with an actual fire.  "Mom" likes to make sure her kids start
the day off with a REALLY BIG breakfast.  And the scene in
which Jennifer explains sex and the concept of masturbation to
her ultra-straight "mother" is worth at least two-thirds of the
ticket price by itself.  But writer/director Gary Ross (the man
who brought you "Big") also devotes a significant amount of the
film's two-hour running time to more serious issues like racism,
the loss of innocence, and finding the courage to follow your
dreams despite what others think.  None of these issues are
particularly original, but the movie handles them so uniquely
that they feel like a breath of fresh air.  There are no guns,
no car chases, no nudity... just a solid, entertaining story
which flawlessly captures the feel of shows like "Andy Griffith"
and "Leave it to Beaver," feeling like fifty-percent homage
and fifty-percent satire (look for an amusing cameo by Andy
Griffith's sidekick, Don "Barney Fife" Knotts).  We also get
plenty of great "fish out of water" comedy; in many ways,
"Pleasantville" reminded me of a slightly more cerebral "Back
to the Future."  But the overall tone of the story is quite
serious, and there's a good deal of both sadness and personal
triumph contained in the movie.
        I had pegged "What Dreams May Come" as a shoo-in for
"Best Special Effects" or "Best Technical Innovation," but now
I'm not so sure.  "Pleasantville" is a visual marvel, seamlessly
integrating color and black and white into the same shots for
much of the film's duration.  You have to see it to believe it,
particularly the scene in which David and his gal-pal take a
drive in the country.  One of the nicest things about the movie's
colors is that they all have a faded, neon-esque quality to them,
akin to what you might find in a 1950s film.  It's a perfect
(and subtle) note of nostalgia.
        This is the second movie this year (after "What Dreams
May Come") to completely astonish me.  Beautifully photographed,
cleverly written, and always fascinating, "Pleasantville" should
not be missed by anyone.  Its ambiguous ending leaves a number
of major questions unanswered (What was Don Knotts's character
REALLY up to?  How does Jennifer cope with the situation she
finds herself in at the conclusion of the story?), but rather
than being a detriment, I actually found that these unresolved
issues gave me a lot of food for thought after the end credits
began to roll... and that's something that all too few films do
these days.
        (Answer to the trivia question: in the '40s and '50s,
advertisements for upcoming movies were typically shown AFTER
the feature film, hence the term "trailer."  The end credits
for movies are much longer now than they were then, and most
people leave before the credits are finished; as such, the
ads are now shown before the main feature, although the term
"trailer" is still used.)

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Folks who lived through the 1950's certainly remember much of the purity
that decade had.  Mom vacuumed in pearls and baked cookies with her good
dress and kitchen apron attached.  Dad wore the same suit to work
everyday and left the house each morning and returned each evening with
the same greeting to his family.  The kids were raised wholesome with
good breakfasts made by mom.  Girls wore skirts and dresses down to
their ankles and boys were clean cut as everything was squeaky clean.
Utopia to some but secret repression to others.  The open minded and
diverse approach to life is the difference between colour and black and
white in 'Pleasantville'.
Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon are two teenagers made in the 90's.
Halter tops for the girls, baggy pants for the boys, body piercing,
sexual appetites fulfilled and a teenager's life is complete?  Notice
the question mark.  Maguire's character is a big fan of a black and
white television sitcom from the 50's called 'Pleasantville'.  In the
tradition of 'Father Knows Best' and 'The Andy Griffith Show',
'Pleasantville' is the all American image of a decade gone forever.
While 60's, 70's and even some 80's type culture has come back to
society in the 90's, culture of the 50's has not and probably never
will.
Children of divorced parents, Maguire and Witherspoon argue one evening
after mom leaves to spend the weekend with her boyfriend.  Maguire wants
to watch a 'Pleasantville' marathon on television while Witherspoon
desires a rock concert on television with her boyfriend who is coming
over shortly.  During the argument, they break the television remote
control.  A few moments later, a mysterious t.v. repair man (Don Knotts)
pays a visit to the house and gives the kids what looks like an antique
remote control.  Knotts is fascinated by the fact that Maguire is a big
fan of 'Pleasantville' and after he leaves, the kids struggle with the
new remote and get sucked into a black and white fantasy world inside
their television.  They are now a part of the town of Pleasantville.
Their new family is a complete shock to them.  Mom (Joan Allen) and dad
(William H. Macy) are stereotypes of the 50's described earlier in the
review.
The other folks in the town who are major players in the film are a cafe
employee played by Jeff Daniels who is an aspiring painter and the
town's mayor, J.T. Walsh and this is Walsh's last film since he passed
away earlier in 1998 from a heart attack.
As the film progresses, the kids from the 90's bring their personal
lifestyles to their new fantasy life and slowly things around them turn
to colour.  Some of the town's folks like it and others don't.  A town
council meeting is called to look into whether or not the new colourful
life brought to Pleasantville can be considered criminal activity.  A
metaphor for the McCarthy hearings, no doubt.
'Pleasantville' is written and directed by Gary Ross who was involved in
creating film pleasures such as 1988's 'Big' and 1993's 'Dave'.  Ross
has found a new direction in film that works on many levels but he does
fails to create any real edge.  The film is emotionally satisfying but
lacks excitement, however it compensates for it with excellent
performances from the actors, some of whom have their characters
experience an emotional metamorphosis.
Just to be clear, movies have to get at least three and a half stars out
of five for me to recommend them and 'Pleasantville' is an original
piece of movie entertainment that is far from being a masterpiece but it
may go down as a mild film classic but that will depend on society's
intention to grasp and accept a cultural giant from the past.  The
question is "Will they or won't they?"
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Matt Williams
Pleasantville is, of all things, a pleasant little film.  It asks the
question, what would the world be like if everything was perfect?  And
then it uses that, not only as a launchpad for social commentary on
contemporary values, but as an examination on the roles of passion and
change in our lives.  Though inconsistent and obvious at times, the film
manages to be elegant and subtle in others, and makes for a pleasant
time at the movies.
Pleasantville is the name of a stereotypical 50's black and white
sitcom, where everything is, well, pleasant.  Mom and Dad have all the
answers to even the toughest problems in this small town.  There's no
crime, fewer worries, and even the firemen only have to rescue cats from
trees.  In short, it's about as far from reality as you can get.
But it's the reality 90s teen David (Tobey Maguire) yearns for.  A
hopeless outcast in the increasingly frightening real world, David longs
for the "perfect" existence in his favorite old sitcom.  His slutty twin
sister, Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon), simply thinks he's nuts.  She'd
rather watch MTV than some moth-eaten rerun. However, when their
television remote breaks, it looks like neither of them will have their
way.
That is, until a mysterious TV repairman (Don Knotts) shows up.  He
gives David a gift: a magical remote which zaps David and his sister
into the world of Pleasantville.  There they take the place of Bud and
Mary Sue, the kids of the Parker family, including salesman dad George
(William H. Macy), and the perfect housewife, Betty (Joan Allen).
But David and Jennifer soon discover that "pleasant" isn't all it's
cracked up to be. In fact, it's somewhat repetitive and boring.  The
people of Pleasantville have no idea what to do outside the constructs
of the various episodes.  In fact, there's literally nothing outside of
Pleasantville (which apparently curves back around upon itself).  But,
when David and Jennifer introduce their 90s sensibilities into this 50s
world, things begin to change in Pleasantville...something which has
never happened before.
Pleasantville utilizes an ingenious technique to demonstrate these
changes.  As passion, in any form, begins to creep into the
black-and-white world of Pleasantville, slowly objects and people erupt
in color.  At first, the changes are minor, but as the citizenry of
Pleasantville learn of the possibilities of change, color springs up all
around.
Toward the end, the film gets a bit heavy-handed in its overall
"message", but, along the way, it delivers several poignant and
memorable scenes.  The film has potential in its middle passages as it
moves beyond simple television satire, and into an exploration of
innocence and potential. However, it then clumsily segues into a
ill-conceived tone nearly as preachy as the one it tries to condemn.
One of the more serious problems with the film is with its two leads.
Both Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon are, well, bland.  And when
you're forced to compare them with a purposefully "bland" world, the
comparison doesn't hold as much weight as it should.  By contrast, many
of the Pleasantville characters (including Joan Allen, J.T. Walsh as the
town mayor, and Jeff Daniels as the local malt shop guy) are much more
colorful...even in black and white.
If you can manage it, try to avoid the trailers and advertisements for
the movie, as they give away most of the film's surprises.  Not that
it's much of a spoiler (since you can see most of the plot developments
coming from miles away), but the few moments of discovery in this film
are best if they're fresh.
Overall, Pleasantville is a nice film with a few nice moments, and a
generally nice case. But it is obviously striving to be more than
"nice", and to achieve a depth of meaning which it never reaches.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Author
Brian Takeshita
David (Tobie Maguire) and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon) are twin brother and
sister, but the bond that all twins supposedly have just isn't there.  In
fact, they couldn't be more dissimilar:  David is a social reject and not
given a second thought by the girls in his high school senior class.
Jennifer, on the other hand, is more along the lines of the school slut.
While Jennifer enjoys a pretty heavy social scene, David's world exists
largely in front of the TV, watching the cable channel full of hits from
television's golden age.  One evening, while their single mom is out of
town, the two kids fight over who gets to use the TV.  Jennifer has the
hottest guy in school coming over to watch MTV, but David is all set to
watch the Pleasantville marathon - hours and hours of his favorite black and
white show, during which they'll be holding a Pleasantville trivia contest
where he could win a thousand dollars.  During a struggle over the remote
control, it gets flung across the room and shatters to pieces.  "This is a
new TV," says David.  "It doesn't work without a remote."  Uh, oh.
Luckily (and mysteriously), a friendly TV repairman (Don Knotts) shows up at
their door just at that moment and gives them a specially made remote.  "One
that really puts you right in the show," he says.  No sooner does David flip
on the Pleasantville marathon than the two are at it again, struggling over
the new device.  Suddenly, they're zapped into the sitcom.  They have now
become Bud and Mary Sue Parker, two of Pleasantville's main characters.
Faced with this incredibly strange turn of events, they must live out the
lives of the fictional family members in the Pleasantville world until David
can contact the repairman (who talks to them through the Parker family
television set) and convince him to take them back home.
Gosh, there are so many possibilities that could be explored with this
setup, comedic and otherwise.  Screenwriter and director Gary Ross takes one
of the more obvious, but also one of the most intriguing routes by setting
up the two kids as travelers in terra incognito.  On the surface, it would
seem that PLEASANTVILLE is meant to contrast the sets of values between
1950's television and the real world of the 90's, but it's actually quite a
bit more than that.  As David and Jennifer interact with the characters of
the TV show, they open the fictional personalities' worlds up to new and
different experiences and ways of thinking.  We see that the "values" of the
Pleasantville citizens are rooted in the fact that they have lived
two-dimensional lives and have been deprived of the knowledge that exists
beyond the television script.  Once in the Pleasantville world, the movie
switches to black and white, but as the citizens learn to step beyond their
accustomed boundaries, people and things gradually being to gain color.
This is a metaphor not only for the added dimension one gains when opened to
a new way of thinking, but also for the way in which the townsfolk learn
that, for good or bad, life is not so clear cut (black and white) after all.
Ross and cinematographer John Lindley have a keen eye for shooting,
composing, and lighting the scenes much like television from the period,
adding significantly to the TV sitcom feel.  Ross also delivers some
effective jokes by up-playing the incongruity between TV and real life, such
as when Jennifer goes to the ladies room and finds there are no toilets.  We
never see TV actors answer nature's call, so the facilities just don't
exist.  Later, we learn that no one in the town knows how to put out a fire,
since all the fire department ever had to do in any of the Pleasantville
episodes was rescue cats from trees.  Watching the first half hour in which
we're treated to the saccharine words and actions of the Pleasantville
characters is good fun as we identify them with similar characters from such
shows as "Leave it to Beaver," "Father Knows Best," and "The Adventures of
Ozzie and Harriet."  All the actors look as if they had a great time playing
their roles, and do so with relish.  It's rare you get to go over the top so
much as in this film.
Among those clearly having the most fun are William H. Macy and Joan Allen,
who play George and Betty Parker, Bud and Mary Sue's TV parents.  Starting
out as the stereotypical sitcom mom and dad, they have the difficult job of
playing characters who go through the most extreme changes as their world is
turned upside-down.  However, with their more than competent level of
acting, they pull it off without a hitch.
Jeff Daniels is also present as Mr. Johnson, who runs the soda fountain.
Through Mr. Johnson, we get one of the more enjoyable looks at the pleasure
in finding something new, especially when he discovers his love of art.
There's a wondrous scene where he flips through an art book full of
beautiful, colorful (remember, most of the world is still black and white)
images.  I'll admit, this scene contained the obligatory famous paintings
(at one point, I thought to myself, "I'll bet the next one will be van
Gogh's 'Starry Night,'" and it was), so the wonder may not be quite the same
for us, but it's still very effective.  Unfortunately, much of the attention
given to his character is unwisely focused on his relationship with Betty
Parker, an aspect which only confuses the film and drags it down.
Maguire and Witherspoon are very good as the fish out of water.  Maguire
came onto the acting scene about five years ago when he played the title
character in the short-lived (and very underrated) Fox series, "Great
Scott!"  Witherspoon gained notoriety from her performance in the 1993 film,
A FAR OFF PLACE, and has had an accelerated career since the movie FEAR,
with Mark Wahlberg.  Both provide fine performances, but also show a lot of
potential for doing greater things as they develop their skills.
As much as there's a villain in PLEASANTVILLE, it's J.T. Walsh in his final
performance as the town's mayor, Big Bob.  Walsh offers his usual
magnanimous presence as the leader of the opposition to all the change
that's happening, and best off all, he looks like he's having fun in the
role, too.  Not a bad one on which to make his exit.
There are a few downsides to the film, such as the fact that we get bashed
over the head with the morality lesson a few times.  When the town citizenry
becomes polarized between those who have become colorized and those who have
not (the spectrally challenged?) prejudice erupts and signs reading "No
Coloreds" get posted in store windows.  There's even a book burning to rid
the library of the evil literature like Mark Twain and J.D. Salinger,
harkening to the imagery of the German Nazi's.  I was also disappointed that
the film didn't address the issue of what happened to the original Bud and
Mary Sue that David and Jennifer replaced, and this is only one of the
reasons the end of the film screams, "Sequel!"  However, these points didn't
detract all that much from the film's otherwise enjoyable nature.  For a
couple of hours, PLEASANTVILLE transports us into another world that's,
well, quite pleasant.

Author
Michael Dequina
_Pleasantville_ (PG-13) *** 1/2 (out of ****)
Thanks to a magical remote control, '90s fraternal twin siblings David
(Tobey Maguire) and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon) get sucked into the
wholesome, black-and-white, 1950s TV sitcom world of Pleasantville.  It's a
gimmicky premise, one that would appear to set the stage for a
too-cute-for-its-own-good film.  But writer-director Gary Ross uses the
gimmick as the springboard for a wildly clever fable of self-discovery in
which the two teens' contemporary sensibilities break the citizens of
Pleasantville from their antiquated bonds of repression.  Spiritual
awakening is not without its side effects, most visibly being a
part-by-part transformation from drab duotones to vibrant
Technicolor--which leads to a sly (and most unexpected) satire of racial
politics.
The beauty of _Pleasantville_ is while it tackles some issues that are
high-minded, the film itself is not.  Ross has his cake and eats it too,
being socially relevant without being preachy, never once forgetting the
film's duty to the audience is to entertain--and that it does.  The script
is as funny as it is wholly original, and it is filled with memorable
characters, such as the seemingly happy marrieds George (William H. Macy)
and Betty Parker (Joan Allen) and timid malt shop owner Mr. Johnson (Jeff
Daniels).  If the script has a shortcoming, it is that the arcs of the two
main characters, '50s-loving David and wild '90s girl Jennifer, are rather
predictable.  The one element of _Pleasantville_ that is perhaps attracting
the most attention is the special effects wizardry used to mix black and
white with color; while the resulting visuals are stunning, what makes the
effects work all the more impressive is how they are used to support story
ideas rather than to serve as gratuitous eye candy.  (opens October 23)
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Gary Ross
Cast: Tobey Maguire, Jeff Daniels, Joan Allen, William H. Macy, J.T.
Walsh, Reese Witherspoon, Don Knotts
Screenplay: Gary Ross
Producers: Robert John Degus, Jon Kilik, Gary Ross, Steven Soderbergh
Runtime: 116 min.
US Distribution: New Line Cinema
Rated PG-13: thematic elements, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
While watching Gary Ross' Pleasantville, I realized how cynical films
have become.  Pleasantville, as its title implies, is not at all
cynical:  in fact, I'd say its most notable virtue is its bright
optimism for human life.  It's a visually impressive film, and one of
the only pictures of the year to use special effects to convey a story
rather than to blind or assault the senses of audience members.  Written
with insight and acted with care, Pleasantville is one of 1998s most
ambitious pictures.  
But, as much as I admire it, it's a seriously flawed picture.  I was
reminded of my recent experience with What Dreams May Come, which is a
visually astounding and ambitious film, as well:  both pictures are
boundless in their ideas, but both fail to assemble the ideas coherently
and make their themes clear.  Pleasantville begins like it really knows
what its about, but by the end, it seems self-important and simplistic
in its claims.  Comparisons to The Truman Show are inevitable, but
Pleasantville lacks the poignancy and bite of Truman.  
It also requires a lot of suspension of disbelief, but I was willing to
humor Ross.  The film's hero is a high-school nerd named David (Tobey
Maguire), a kid obsessed with a TV show of the 50s called
Pleasantville.  The show is, of course, fictional, but it captures the
feel of those TV shows perfectly:  dad comes home every night at the
same time, shouts, "Honey, I'm home!" and his wife has dinner ready for
him.  The kids love their parents.  The balance is there.  Everything is
perfect.  And, through a series of highly unlikely events (I won't
bother explaining, because it's just so strange), David, and his sister
Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon) end up inside the show -- inside
Pleasantville.  It's a culture shock, especially to Jennifer, who has
the reputation of "school slut."
After realizing they're in black and white ("We're supposed to be in
color!" Jennifer shouts), they first meet their parents, George (William
H. Macy) and Betty (Joan Allen), and are forced to eat a mountainous
breakfast of pancakes, eggs, and ham steak.  It's a good thing David is
a pro with Pleasantville-trivia, otherwise he wouldn't know who their
friends are, what the neighbors names are, and what is supposed to
happen in each episode.  It's only when they start messing with the
equilibrium that things go awry:  everything begins when Jennifer has
ravenous sex with a basketball jock.  From there, real human emotions
begin to shine through the perfect facade of the show -- rage, passion,
and love emerge, and with these emotions, color.
Technically, the film is fantastic.  Ross, who previously wrote the
scripts for Big and Dave, is an intelligent writer and a gifted artist. 
The look of the film -- beginning with the production design and
concluding with the remarkable contrasts between black & white and color
-- is inventive and a reward for the eyes.  The world of Pleasantville
is complete, and the image never fails to convince.  It's also a
well-written picture in its plot details and characterization; the main
characters are developed fully, and even the secondary characters are
given enough depth to make them interesting.
Of course, it helps that Ross has such a talented cast to work with. 
Maguire makes a good hero; he's sincere, and he's likable in this role. 
Witherspoon nails the high school slut image with perfection.  Macy is
charming as the father, layering a character who could have been very
one-dimensional (the final scene in the courtroom is moving only because
of him).  Allen is powerful as Betty; her development from housewife to
the independent woman is one of the more affecting of the film's
stories.  Jeff Daniels, playing a soda shop owner who discovers that he
loves to paint, also gives a fine performance.
There's really only one problem with Pleasantville, and it's a broad
problem that affects nearly every aspect of the picture:  it really
doesn't know what it's about.  It's theme is simple enough -- don't hold
in your passions, and your life will be better.  But Ross' metaphors
aren't solid; as much as I like the color idea, it really doesn't make a
lot of sense:  why certain people "get their color" and why others don't
is never made perfectly clear.  And then there are little details that
irritated me (how do the residents know the colors by name if they've
never seen them?).
Blazing with optimism, the film nearly blinds itself in the final
hour.  The first half, which focuses on the kids' clash with their new
surroundings, is often hilarious (the basketball scene is simply
ingenious).  But when feelings of racism arise, and people are
discriminated against for being "colored," the film extends beyond the
level of seriousness that its premise permits.  Let's face it: 
Pleasantville is a fantasy that revolves around a lot of things that
could never happen.  And while it's fine to do fantasy and have serious
themes, Ross takes his material far too seriously in the final half
hour.  Then there's the courtroom scene, which features the late J.T.
Walsh as the Rush Limbaugh-type mayor persecuting David for bringing
color to their serene world.  This scene is totally unnecessary, and
simply wipes away any subtlety that the film had managed to gather until
that point.
And there's one last detail:  the world of Pleasantville has never
really existed.  People have never been as naive or inexperienced as
they are in this film.  I like the theme -- I think it's a good idea to
embrace your passions.  But, when you think about the film as a whole --
the color stuff, the race issues, even the vague poke at the television
industry -- it seems the picture doesn't really know what it's saying,
and covers it up with simplistic claims like "be true to yourself."  
But I can't ignore Pleasantville's strength:  it would be a crime to
shun a feel-good movie as ambitious as this one.  The flaws are there,
and they're significant, but they don't erase the heart and hopefulness
of Ross' picture.  Finally, a film that says there might be something
worth living for.   

Author
Dennis Schwartz

PLEASANTVILLE (director/writer:Gary Ross; cinematographer: John Lindley;
cast:Tobey Maguire (David/Bud Parker), Jeff Daniels (Johnson), Joan
Allen (Betty Parker),William H. Macy (George Parker), J.T. Walsh (Big
Bob), Don Knotts (TV Repairman), Marley Shelton (Margaret), Jane
Kaczmarek (David's Mom), Reese Witherspoon (Jennifer/Mary Sue Parker),
1998)
Obviously there is no such a place as Pleasantville, except in a sitcom.
But Pleasantville the movie and the sitcom in the movie, is made into an
idealized homogenous (all white) illusionary place, where a brother and
sister will be transported into this never-never land of TV fantasy of
the 1950s and 1960s, where everyone is repressed and seen in
black-and-white sitcom form, reminiscent of shows like Father Knows
Best, The Donna Reed Show, and The Adventures of Ozzie & Harriet.
Pleasantville is a film about how selective one's memory is when it
comes to nostalgia, of pining for values that never existed back then
but still are the values exemplified for the traditional family, of the
resistance to change, and clashes between those in the film who become
"colored" and those who remain in "black-and-white," and about the need
to be an individual and not conform.
Pleasantville opens in the '90s, where a fast lifestyle and family
dysfunctionality seem to be the norm. Teenagers David (Tobey Maguire)
and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon) are the twins of a troubled single-
parent (Jane), who is never there for them. At night, with their mom out
on a date, David is all keyed up to watch a marathon of his favorite TV
program, Pleasantville, of which he is an expert on, knowing every
character and minor detail about the show. Meanwhile, Jenn has a heavy
date with a hunk she wants to be romantic with while watching MTV. The
twins end up fighting over the remote for the TV show they want to see
and it breaks apart, but bingo, a TV repairman (Don Knotts) who wasn't
even called by them appears at their door and gives them a new magical
remote (supposedly coming here because of David's true love and
knowledge of the Pleasantville TV show), and with the new remote
switched on, the twins are now trapped in the TV program Pleasantville,
taking the place of the TV siblings Bud and Mary Sue. They are now in a
place where people regularly say swell and keen, the weather is always
perfect at 72 degrees, there is no such thing as rain, no colors
(therefore no discrimination), no sex, no profanity, no fires (firemen
only rescue cats), and everything is just peachy. Their new parents are
the perfect couple George (William H. Macy) and Betty (Joan Allen),
whose idea of marriage revolves around each of them knowing their place-
he works and she stays home with a smile on her face, while kept busy by
cleaning, cooking, and taking care of the children.
David and Jenn have a different outlook on life, with him relating to
the simple existence of Pleasantville and upset that he can't fit in
with the turbulent '90s: he finds it hard to talk to girls his age, in
class he is upset to hear about incurable diseases, ozone depletion, and
a tough job market. While Jenn is content with the "new age" freedom of
the '90s in sex and not interested in anything that is not "cool."
It's fairly predictable what will happen once the two realize that they
are transformed into an unreal TV world, as the film prepares to go into
its satire mold and take apart the blandness of such perfection. David
has no problem getting right into the program, while Jenn calls this
place "Nerdville" and wants out immediately. The calendar permanently
reads 1958, but the two, are stuck with their '90s views on things. At
school everything seems more innocent and less tense, dates take place
over ice cream sodas and cheese burgers, and being pinned means holding
hands not having sex, the basketball team wins every game, and there is
nothing really to learn in school that is perplexing because there is
nothing outside of Pleasantville. But this changes when Jenn asks
questions about what is outside of Pleasantville and takes her boyfriend
to lover's lane for some serious sex. When things change, colors start
to appear, it seems as if Jenn/Mary Sue has begun to upset the universe
for these naive folks.
As expected, the siblings can't help but disrupt this simplistic
community after living in a supposedly more sophisticated time period,
and such things as color, emotions, jealousies, sex, conflicts, makeup
for women, and other changes are now brought into this insular community
like diseases transmitted to the modern world. The filmmaker then
analyzes these changes on those newly affected and the result is a more
troubled but more interesting people emerging. Through special effects
from digital processing, flowers start taking on color and the film
begins to have a modern-day "Alice in Wonderland" look to it.
Jeff Daniels plays the stunted soda shop owner (Mr. Johnson) who makes
Betty sexually aware of herself and who blossoms when Bud/David gives
him art books and he discovers he can paint in colors. The movie makes
the point that the revolutionary changes in the '60s came about when
people became dissatisfied with the staidness of the '50s and began to
experiment and expand their horizons. J.T. Walsh is Big Bob, the mayor
of the town, in an uninspiring role as the most ardent one against
change.
There was something that rubbed me the wrong way about this "cute" idea
of a film, besides the fact it was boring and I felt as if I was being
lectured to about the obvious general ills of society. There are no
radical new ideas presented in this film that will make me really think
about these issues any differently than the films of the 1950s would
have; it is as if the filmmaker is saying that 1950s didn't have films
that were critical of society: but a list of such films would be very
extensive (Marty, High Noon, Ace in the Hole, etc.). This snooty
attitude, looking down at the past from the vantage point of a
supposedly "hip" new age bothered me. Afterall, my impression of this
film, is that it really is a 1950s sitcom merging with a 1990s "feel
good" type of sitcom, and nothing more. It is basically, a gimmicky
film, which is the only new ground it breaks, selling an idea about the
past that connects it with the present, but doing it at the expense of
telling the truth about neither the past or present.
The film presumes that through the efforts of these spoiled teens, that
they will break through the "ignorance is bliss community" and bring
about art and literature and a more enlightened attitude toward sex, and
to inspire a climate for more responsible social changes. The film is
trying to say that the innocence of the 1950s must be merged with the
social awareness of the 1990s and this can only be accomplished by the
teenage heroes, who are not afraid to take chances and change the times
they're in. I just didn't buy into this premise and was not convinced
that I wasn't seeing anything but a superficial film. For instance,
having Jenn/Mary Sue substitute her new ideas of sexual feelings by
reading "Lady Chatterley's Lover" instead of going out with her
boyfriend and having sex, seemed to me to be a phony response to what
literature can offer. Character development is a raising of
consciousness that comes about only through a real inward awareness, a
book can only act as a catalyst for that experience. What is offered
movie-wise, is just the kind of empty gestures made to genuine problems,
which can be found on TV programs from both yesterday and today.
Therefore it is just another empty gesture at culture, trying to be
cute, letting the baby boomers know that it's okay, there're doing just
fine. You can keep being materialists, just be cool about it! And by not
upsetting the apple cart, just railing against the general ills of
society, the filmmaker has succeeded in tapping into a huge audience by
not being probative enough, allowing the film's nostalgia to play for it
rather than to make one really tune into the '90s aspect of the film it
brings up about the real problems this society faces that are not being
met, such as, families in crises situations, environments being raped,
art and literature being more removed from mainstream America than ever
before, schools that can't educate most of their students effectively, a
continuation of bland TV programs (getting more obscene is not
necessarily an advancement), and a society that is confused about the
values it thinks are important. The film has simply lost track of its
critique of society, and has failed to show how one age has evolved from
another, with each age being misled by those trying to force its values
onto another age. There was no one in this film who understood how to
bridge the past with the future, instead this becomes a film just like
the sitcoms it parodies, which means it's just another escape film,
unable or unwilling to delve deeply into all the real problems it brings
up.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus'  World Movie Reviews"
 ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Scott Renshaw
PLEASANTVILLE
(New Line)
Starring:  Tobey Maguire, Reese Witherspoon, Joan Allen, William H. Macy,
Jeff Daniels, J. T. Walsh, Don Knotts.
Screenplay:  Gary Ross.
Producers:  Gary Ross, Jon Kilik, Robert J. Degus and Steven Soderbergh.
Director:  Gary Ross.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (sexual situations, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  122 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In PLEASANTVILLE U.S.A., it's always 72 degrees and sunny.  Every
house has a white picket fence, and a mom at home who has dinner on the
table at 6:00 sharp.  The hometown high school basketball team has never
lost a game -- in fact, it has never missed a basket.  Teenage lovebirds
never go any farther than holding hands, and only then after they've been
"pinned."  The world and its values are completely black-and-white --
particularly white in the case of the population demographics.  In
PLEASANTVILLE everything is always perfect, it's always 1958, and nothing
ever changes.
     The one minor problem with Pleasantville is that it doesn't exist,
nor has it ever existed.  It's the world of an innocuous 1950s family
sit-com, played in perpetual reruns on a cable nostalgia network.  That
doesn't prevent it from being extremely attractive to David (Tobey
Maguire), a high school senior living in a single-parent home and a 1990s
world of AIDS, economic uncertainty and warnings of impending
environmental collapse.  For David, Pleasantville is an escape, but he
never expects to be physically transported, along with his wild-child twin
sister Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon), into the world of the sit-com itself.
There they take on the roles of Bud and Mary Sue, the wholesome offspring
of wholesome parents George (William H. Macy) and Betty (Joan Allen) in a
wholesome town where the road comes right back to where you started.
     It's a great high-concept premise which could have worked strictly as
a fish-out-of-water comedy.  Jennifer is overwhelmed by the massive
breakfast prepared by Betty, complete with ham steak and drenched in
syrup; the basketball team captain responds with blank stares to
Jennifer's sexual advances; the local fire department exists solely to
rescue cats from trees.  While Jennifer does her best to turn
Pleasantville upside-down with her contemporary ways, David does his best
to minimize the damage and preserve the simple world he has come to love.
Screenwriter Gary Ross (BIG, DAVE) continues to show a flair for high
concepts with a human touch in his directorial debut, generating laughs
from the clash of Eisenhower-era and Clinton-era mores, as well as from
characters awakening to the fact that seeking fulfillment may mean an end
to their static bliss.
     But PLEASANTVILLE isn't merely a whimsical lark.  As he exposes his
characters to experiences they'd never even considered, Ross turns the
film into a pointed examination of what we really mean when we talk about
"traditional family values."  The sudden emergence of teenage rebellion
and nascent feminism send townspeople into a panicked search for any way
to ensure stability, driven by Pleasantville mayor Big Bob (the late J. T.
Walsh, playing a marvelous amalgam of conservative platitude-spitters).
PLEASANTVILLE digs into the barely-concealed anxiety and xenophobia at the
heart of so much political retro-think, yet that's not even the film's
most daring idea.  Ross has the guts to take on the notion of original sin
itself, suggesting that the very passion and curiosity which lead to
upheaval in paradise are also what make us most alive and most human,
giving color to an otherwise monochromatic existence.
     It's unfortunate that Ross gets a bit too self-congratulatory about
his social satire, particularly in the final half-hour.  As tensions build
in Pleasantville, the battle becomes a clash between those characters
still in black-and-white and those whose new, life-changing experiences
have left them "colored" -- and that may be the _least_ consistently
underlined point.  Ross starts repeating himself, weighing down the
previously light tone and drifting away from solid dramatic anchors like
Joan Allen's housewife on a journey of self-discovery.  PLEASANTVILLE is a
funny and thoughtful film, the kind that works best before it starts
tattooing The Moral of the Story across your backbrain.  It's plenty
entertaining just watching the mythology of the "good old days" laid bare,
exposed as a comforting fiction far removed from a world where coping with
change is more productive than demonizing it.

Author
John Carroll
I rented this movie with very high hopes. This movie got praise as one of the
best films of 1998, and unfortunately, was not as good as I hoped, but was
still very intriguing and thought provoking.
First of all, the casting for this film is great. Tobey Maguire and Reese
Witherspoon are the future of Hollywood. They play their roles as the Parker
brother and sister perfectly. With a plot as unbelievable as this film, you
need chemistry and honest acting from your cast. Tobey and Reese (Bud and Mary
Sue Parker) play their roles perfectly and display their characters with
honesty and believability. 
William H. Macy, an actor I have grown to love over the past year, turns in
another great performance as the TV dad who is torn over his wife, a "colored"
person and his friends, the "non-colored" ones. He also displays believability
and must display a certain lack of chemistry with his wife. He does this
perfectly and yet again shows why he should be one of the top actors in
Hollywood.
Joan Allen is equally great as Betty Parker, the ideal TV Mom. Her character is
the most ambitious. She is very nave, and must display this well to make her
character believable and she does just that. Her lack of chemistry with Macy,
which the role calls for, and her developed chemistry with Jeff Daniels is
terrific, and if Daniels would have been as stellar as the rest of the cast,
then this film would even been even better.
As said before, Jeff Daniels gives a bad performance. His character displays
the change going on throughout the town, yet he does not display it with enough
conviction. His character is very confusing and he is not very believable. This
film could have been elevated to a whole new level had Daniels been able to
give a better performance.
The movie is very provocative. It challenges the issues of racism that existed
in the past and that still exist today. I really was not expecting all of the
elements they brought up, but they pulled them off with such flair that it was
mind blowing. They demonstrate the racism issue without a hitch, but do it in a
slow pace.
The only major flaw in the film besides the performance by Daniels is length.
Some films are not meant to be that long. Pleasantville is one of those films.
This film could have been so much better had they not moved so slowly to it.
First, they are amazed by the implementation of color. Then they want to have
it. Then they do not want to. Then the war ensues between the colored and
non-colored. This is all strung out over two hours, which was way too long.
Some movies need a lot of time. Saving Private Ryan was a little bit under
three hours long and I thought it could have used more time. This film is only
two hours long, and seems much longer. Length is everything in films. If you
can nail down the perfect timing and pace, you can win half the battle.
Pleasantville can move at a good pace at times, but it is not consistent
enough.
Overall, Pleasantville is a very pleasant and provocative departure from the
predictability of most films these days. I went in expecting a light-hearted
film about change. I left learning an important lesson about racism and the way
things change. Luckily, Pleasantville teaches this lesson in such a way to make
it appeal to all audiences. Only if it could have done in a shorter amount of
time.
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Author
Luke Buckmaster
PLEASANTVILLE
Cast: Tobey Maguire, Reese Witherspoon, Jeff Daniels, Joan Allen,
William H. Macy, J.T. Walsh, Don Knotts, Marley Shelton, Jane Kaczmarek
Director: Gary Ross
Producers: Jon Kilik, Robert J. Debus, Steven Soderbergh, Gary Ross
Screenplay: Gary Ross
Cinematography: John Lindley
Music: Randy Newman
Running time: 116 minutes
Australian distributor: Village Roadshow
Australian theatrical release: February 25, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 and a half stars
Towards the end of Pleasantville - one of the most life affirming films
you're likely to see - two characters paint on the side of a local
police station.  Their vibrantly colored portrait depicts classic novels
with wings attached to them, flying above a bonfire that was intended to
destroy them.  Like the film, this picture is a metaphor for cultural
progression.  When there are so many films nowadays that look at our
modern world in a negative light, here is one that displays advancement
as something positive.
Would the world be a better place if it were based in a cheesy 50's
sitcom, where dinner is always on the table, husbands and wives sleep in
different beds, and teenagers hold hands at lovers lane?  Welcome to
Pleasantville, a quaint town that is, literally, black and white.  Two
teenagers - David (Toby Maguire) and Jennifer (Reece Witherspoon) - get
magically transported from the dangerous 90's to the mellow world of
Pleasantville via the usage of a strange TV remote control.  "We're,
like, stuck in nerdville," Jennifer exclaims.
Naturally, the film takes time to cash in on some jokes.  The word
"fire" means nothing to the fire brigade; their idea of an emergency is
rescuing a cat from a tree.  The local basketball team has never missed
a shot, no one has ever heard of the word sex, and the school's library
books are full of blank pages.  Like in Dark City (and, to a lesser
extent, The Truman Show), the residents of Pleasantville see nothing
strange about the way they live - they have accepted the reality given
to them.  At one moment, Jennifer asks a teacher what is outside of
Pleasantville, just to hear "I don't understand" in response.
Before the jokes become tiresome, Pleasantville becomes darker in tone
during its second half.  As Toby and Jennifer (known in town as Bud and
Mary Sue) initiate change in the society, things begin to turn into
color.  Most adults are unwilling to adhere to these new elements,
except soda shop owner Mr. Johnson (Jeff Daniels, in one of his best
roles in years) who has a dream to paint, and Toby and Jennifer's TV
mother Betty (Joan Allen), a likeable woman who craves more excitement
in her life.  Pleasantville mayor Bob (the late J.T Walsh, in his last
film performance) is especially determined to maintain old traditions.
Although Pleasantville begins as a light-headed comedy, it ends up
examining important issues of prejudice, rebellion, change and honor.
That is quite a lot to cram into 116 minutes, but debut director Gary
Ross (writer of Big and Dave) does it with style.  As color contrasts
with black and white, Pleasantville becomes a visual sensation.  It may
be the screenplay (also by Ross) that provides the film with its wit,
humor and emotion, but the special effects certainly play a large part
in reaching out to viewers.  It's hard not to be entranced by the image
of a single red rose amongst a black and white screen, or
Pleasantville's first ever fire (luckily, David shows the firemen how to
put it out).  This burning tree is quite a sight.
Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon have enough charm and interest to
make the two titles roles really work.  Witherspoon's Jennifer is at
first a sex crazed and self absorbed rebellious teenager, but she
gradually matures into a more respectable person.  Witherspoon makes
that transformation believable, and so does Maguire as his character
discovers the thrill of taking risks.  Jeff Daniels has a soft and
placid part, but his character is meaningful and, at times, almost
poignant.  Mr. Johnson's love for painting is understandable, and the
condemnation of his work by some of the town residents seems tragic.
William H. Macy (who regularly plays small parts) rarely catches my eye
as an exceptional performer, but here he does.  Macy's character (David
and Jennifer's TV father) is the only reason why we can relate to the
people who don't want Pleasantville to change.  They are happy living
controlled and repetitive lives, where their surroundings remain dull
but peaceful.
Pleasantville is a truly original film that soars with energy and
beauty.  It has deep meaning and relevance in today's society, and
should serve as a reminder for most that the world is made up of how its
residents think and act.  "You can't stop something that's inside you,"
says David, and that could be a summation of all that Pleasantville
stands for.  I was touched and inspired by this film, and for all the
right reasons.  Although Ross occasionally directs with a little too
much simplicity (his use of symbolism is usually quite obvious),
Pleasantville never complicates or intimidates its audience.
Imaginative, moving and entertaining, this marvelous Hollywood product
should be a prime example of how special effects can be used to aid a
story, and not the other way around.  It would be silly for me to point
out that films like Pleasantville are seldom found - that much is
obvious.


Author
Zach McGhee
PLEASANTVILLE ***1/2* (3 and a half stars)
        It was once said that ignorance is bliss.  But how can you
know bliss while ignorant?  If you know not sorrow, you know
not happiness, and vice versa.  Such is the story of Pleasantville,
a movie that's, quite frankly, inspired.  The story of a 1950's town
who's long lasting ignorance is challenged by modern day pop culture.
The result of society's ultimate reaction to change.
        In today's world, we treat life loosely, with little value.
Many consider material things to be more valuable than long term
happiness, and simply obtain them to fill such holes of loss and
greed.  Others search for a happier time and place, and secretly
hope for a return to our past.  A time many call safer, better, more
compassionate. Two such examples are modern day teens David
(Tobey Maguire) and Jen (Reese Witherspoon).  While David regularly
drowns out his chaotic reality by immersing himself in reruns of the
1950's sit-com, Pleasantville, sister Jen lusts after cute boys as an
admitted slut, climbing the social ladder through sex appeal.  But,
as Jen prepares for a date with MTV, and David for his much anticipated
Pleasantville marathon, a doorbell is rung.  A strange, unrequested
TV repairman (Don Knotts) gives them a remote to replace their
recently shattered one, after quickly quizzing David as to his
knowledge of Pleasantville.  After his departure, the two teens
quarrel in an effort to win the remote.  During the fight, a button is
pushed, and the two are transported into the very fictional, very
colorless world of Pleasantville.
        David, realizing that if they wish to get out soon they
can't tinker with the mindset of pleasant-folk, urges Jen to do the
same, and play along.  While she starts out well, she quickly loses
her balance, creating a domino effect of immense proportions, after
introducing the element of sex to the quirky little town.  Soon,
the black and white universe begins to sprout color.  Among the
newly enlightened, the perfect Pleasantville mother, Betty
(Joan Allen).  But, it's not just about sex.  Color can appear as
a result of love, compassion, anger, or hate.  It is about
individuality, the free agency to choose between what is right
and what is wrong, rather than stay confined to a "normal" and
supposedly perfect world.  We cannot become perfect by force, but
must be allowed to make mistakes, and strive to ascertain it
through correction and discipline.
        One of the film's few missteps hits when it fails to actively portray
some of the unfavorable consequences that can result from such
promiscuous behavior, as our society learned quickly after the sexual
revolution of the 1960's. Though it maintains the absurdity of racism,
another immorality.
        And while, throughout the film, Director Gary Ross may trip a bit with
his "hang on a sec while I beat you over the head with my message so
hard you won't soon forget it" strategy, such as the inclusion of signs
stating "No Coloreds", it does work, something that is a credit to his
history as a screenwriter.  He's also assembled a very capable cast,
including supporting actors Jeff Daniels (Dumb & Dumber), William H.
Macy (Fargo), and the late J.T. Walsh (Breakdown, JFK), as well as the
two leads and Allen (Face/Off).
        The cornerstone of the movie, the gradual inclusion of color
as the town progresses, also has a wide range of integrity, and is
constructed with great subtlety and detail.  It alone is a good reason
to see the film.
        The bottom line is that Pleasantville is a fantastic vision of
our society as its progressed, and while many may still hope and
remember the "good old days", we always must focus ahead on
what will be, not what could've been.

Author
Steve Rhodes
"Flashback to kinder, gentler times, this week on the 'TV Time'
network," goes the ad for the upcoming 24-hour marathon showing of that
hit black-and-white television series from the 1950s, "Pleasantville."
Writer and director Gary Ross, the writer and creator of BIG and DAVE,
delights audiences once again with his best fantasy ever in
PLEASANTVILLE.
David, played by Tobey Maguire from THE ICE STORM, is hands-down the
expert on "Pleasantville" trivia.  He has every line memorized from
every episode and plans to win the call-in contest during the marathon.
His twin sister, Jennifer, played by Reese Witherspoon from TWILIGHT,
thinks the whole idea is stupid.  She's more interested in boys and MTV.
Their teachers have been painting a bleak future for them, including
fewer job prospects, ecological disasters, famines and rising deaths
from AIDS.  Like most teens, they blow all of this off, worrying more
about their own popularity at school than the issues of the day.
Just before the big marathon, a mysterious TV repairman, played by
veteran actor Don Knotts, Barney Fife from  "The Andy Griffith Show,"
comes to the kid's house.  He gives them a high-powered remote control
that causes them to get sucked into the "Pleasantville" television show.
David and Jennifer are now Bud and Mary Sue (a.k.a. Muffin), and they
live in a black-and-white world.  Mary Sue looks at her arms, shrieking,
"I'm pasty!"
Reese Witherspoon delivers a dead-on performance as a sarcastic teen,
who is aghast to be thrown into the plastic 1950s.  She complains that
"We're, like, stuck in nerdville."  She wants out as quickly as possible
until a hunk, who is the captain of the basketball team, makes eyes at
her, following the script of the episode they are in to the letter.  The
captain is supposed to "pin" her that night.
The whole first half of the movie, as the kids cope and alter their new
environment, is comedy at its best.  Intelligently written, the film's
first part produces such a stream of laughter that you may need a second
viewing to catch all the spoken humor and sight gags.
Their milquetoast parents (Joan Allen as Betty Parker and William H.
Macy as George Parker) are a rigidly traditional couple.  Breakfast,
which is in danger of touching the ceiling, consists of stacks of dozens
of pancakes, waffles, and toast.  What constitutes a tragedy in this
family is George's "Honey, I'm home," not producing an instant hot
dinner.
Everything, absolutely everything, has always gone perfectly in
Pleasantville.  When the basketball team practices, every shot goes
through the hoop.  They've never lost a game, and there's no reason to
suspect they ever will.  People are adamantly polite to each other, and
their rituals are as set in concrete as a Latin mass.  Like most
television facades, there are a few things missing, like toilets in the
bathroom stalls and words in the books, but the townsfolk don't mind.
They are incapable of considering any alterations in their cosmos.
The school's geography lesson consists of reviewing the town's two main
streets.  When Mary Sue, with a faux pas of cataclysmic proportions,
asks what is outside of Pleasantville, the students have trouble even
comprehending the question since it is so silly.  ("There are some
places where the road doesn't go in circles, where the road keeps on
going," Bud will explain later to his entranced fellow students.)
David, as Bud, wants to play along with the series' rituals at all
costs, but Jennifer is dead set on shaking up the town by not following
her scripted part as Mary Sue.  She takes her boyfriend to lover's lane
and demonstrates to him its intended purpose.  Up until then, the kids
had gone there to hold hands from opposite sides of the car.  The movie
explores change through the power of reading as well as sex.
It is too bad that PLEASANTVILLE had to come out the same year as THE
TRUMAN SHOW since they will inevitably be compared.  Next to an almost
perfect film like THE TRUMAN SHOW, PLEASANTVILLE isn't as quite as good,
having many fewer memorable lines for one and lacking the talent of a
Jim Carrey for another, but this should not be allowed to detract from
the incredible brilliance of PLEASANTVILLE.
As dazzlingly filmed by John Lindley in a gorgeous black and white, the
movie slowly develops color in small places like roses and tongues,
until it bursts into a bouquet of saturated colors by the end.  (The
press kit explains that the film was actually shot in color.  In
postproduction they took out most of the color but left some of the
fleshtones in and increased the contrast.)
How and why things turn color is one of the mysteries that the story
slowly reveals.  At first the reason seems simple and almost trite, and
then the complete rationale behind the colorization becomes the story's
key turning point.  Visually it is a stunning technical achievement.
Once color appears in this innovative film, women's make-up is shown to
be able to take on an entirely different role.
Starting as a hilarious comedy, the story transforms carefully into a
serious satire on life's insanities.  Although it starts off as a romp,
the film ends up with more messages than you can count, all of them
delivered delicately but powerfully.
Part science fiction, the story asks the age-old question of what would
happen to the future if you could alter the past?  Moreover, would the
results be what you expect and want?  David worries about this a lot,
but Jennifer is more interested in freeing the people from their chains
and the consequences be damned.
The movie contains many great small performances.  Jeff Daniels plays a
soda jerk who comes unglued when he has to alter his routine even
slightly.  The late J.T. Walsh plays the mayor who fights hard to keep
the town's values unaltered.
The story has many surprises.  When there is a fire, for example, what
do you say to firemen who've never seen a fire, and who've spent their
entire lives rescuing cats?  You yell "Cat!" of course, since screaming
"Fire!" leaves them staring at you.
And what does it take to create a large, shocked and confused crowd at
the local Pleasantville furniture store?  Put a bed on display that is
twice the width of the standard issue single bed.  Unheard of.
PLEASANTVILLE runs 2:03.  It is rated PG-13 for sexuality, mature themes
and some profanity and would be fine for kids 12 and up.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
James Sanford
        Back in the mid-1960s, my uncle worked for RCA and managed to get my
family a deal on what was then a state-of-the-art color TV. When we had
"company" over, there were always a few people who insisted on looking at
the set; my sisters and I used to giggle everytime the NBC peacock would
spread its rainbow-hued tail across the screen and prompt amazed gasps from
our guests. What was the big deal? we wondered.
 It's been a long time since anyone made much of a fuss over seeing
colors, but writer-director Gary Ross' "Pleasantville" might change that.
This ambitious, multi-layered movie can be read in a number of different
ways: as a charmingly eccentric fish-out-of-water comedy; as a parable about
the time when the cheerful conformity of the 1950s gave way to the "do your
own thing" vibes of the 1960s; as a rich "Wizard of Oz"-style fairy tale. Or
you can simply choose to appreciate it as a truly rewarding piece of
escapist entertainment. Regardless of how you choose to see "Pleasantville,"
this smart, funny, visually dazzling film is the kind of moviegoing
experience you're unlikely to forget.
 Putting a modern fable onscreen is extraordinarily difficult, the
kind of assignment that's perplexed even veteran directors such as Steven
Spielberg (in the charmless "Hook") and Barry Levinson (whose ghastly "Toys"
was a box office disaster), and though Ross' delightfully clever scripts for
"Big" and "Dave" were both Oscar-nominated he did not direct either film.
For a first film, "Pleasantville" is remarkably smooth without seeming
slick, and crucial tonal transitions in the story that could easily have
proven forced instead seem effortlessly natural.
 What sets Ross' work apart from that of most fledgling directors is
its focus; not only does he know exactly what he wants each scene to say, he
understands how to best get his points across. "Pleasantville" teems with
allusions to the Bible (a burning bush, a radiant red apple), references to
vintage TV ("Andy Griffith Show" star Don Knotts plays the character who
sets the tale in motion) and parallels to historical events, including
Hitler's rise to power and the Krystalnacht he ordered in 1938. It all
sounds far too heavy and portentous to be easily incorporated into what's
essentially a story about contemporary teen twins David (Tobey Maguire) and
Jen (Reese Witherspoon) trapped in the black-and-white confines of an eerily
wholesome 1950s series called "Pleasantville," but against considerable odds
all these diverse elements come together splendidly in the course of two
hours.
 For the socially awkward David, a chance to live among placcid,
predictable people is a dream come true, especially since he's a
"Pleasantville" fanatic and knows all the intricacies of such episodes as
"Trouble at the Barber Shop" and "Bud Gets A Job." For Jen, who prides
herself on being sexually adventurous and grimly anti-intellectual, the
prospect of mingling with the compulsively cheerful and resolutely
celibate -- even married couples sleep in separate single beds --
Pleasantvilleans looks like an opportunity to make some major alterations in
this insular little hamlet. To paraphrase the Talking Heads, Pleasantville
is a place where nothing ever happens; when these outsiders disrupt the
monotony, the results terrify some residents and liberate everyone else.
 The dissention even spreads to David and Jen's hollowly happy home
away from home, where their bland dad George (William H. Macy) is unnerved
by the abrupt changes in mom Betty (Joan Allen), who's no longer always
around when it's time to serve the pineapple kabobs to guests, or to prepare
copious amounts of biscuits, pancakes, bacon and hamsteak for each morning's
breakfast; she'd rather hang out with a soda shop owner (Jeff Daniels) who
dreams of becoming an artist. Bob (J.T. Walsh), Pleasantville's mayor, frets
over such new developments in town as workers who decide to walk off their
mundane jobs in search of more rewarding careers and teens who have suddenly
taken to splitting their time between the library and Lovers Lane. Once
intellectual and hormonal passions have been aroused, there's no turning
back, and the mundane grays of Pleasantville slowly begin to give way to
vivid living color.
 The staggeringly beautiful scenes that depict this transformation
were created by visual effects supervisor Chris Watts and scores of
assistants. But breathtaking as it is, the technical wizardry would be
pointless were it not for the movie's emotional content and resonant
performances by the entire cast; these are the things that elevate
"Pleasantville" out of the realm of pure fantasy and into the category of
human drama. Beyond the digitally composed imagery is a haunting, deeply
affecting story about learning to love, fulfilling your potential and
refusing to be bound by conventionality.
 "Your senses will never be the same" was the tagline used to
promote the splashy, thunderingly loud 1975 film of the Who's "Tommy." But
that slogan could just as easily be applied to "Pleasantville," a brilliant
"art-film" in the very best sense of the term and one that -- for a while
anyway -- may well change the way you look at the world.
James Sanford

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Gary Ross.
Cast: Tobey Maguire, Reese Witherspoon, Joan Allen, Jeff Daniels, 
William H. Macy, J.T. Walsh, Don Knotts, Marley Shelton.
1998 - 122 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed October 24, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
After fighting for the remote control that they have just received from 
a mysterious television repairman (Don Knotts), teenage siblings, David 
(Tobey Maguire), and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon), are transported into 
the t.v. set and find themselves on the black-and-white 50's sitcom, 
"Pleasantville," taking over the places of the children in the show, Bud 
and Mary Sue. Their parents in the show are, as are the rest of the 
parents, the type that you might see on "Father Knows Best," or "Leave 
It to Beaver," with a housewife (Joan Allen) who does all of the cooking 
and cleaning, and a husband (William H. Macy) who goes to work during 
the day, only to return by saying, "Honey, I'm home," and to find his 
dinner waiting for him in the kitchen. Since David is a fan of the show, 
he can always tell which episode is occurring at a certain time, and 
urges Jennifer not to do anything that would disrupt their routine. 
Soon, however, Jennifer has had sex with one of the boys from school, a 
thing that no one in the show has previously even known about, and as 
many of the people in Pleasantville become open to new, fresh ideas, 
parts of the fictional world begin to subtly turn to real colors, 
including the people themselves.
If there was one word to describe Gary Ross' new fantasy, 
"Pleasantville," it would be the word, magical, and the less said about 
the story, the better. The film is a wholeheartedly original motion 
pcture, visually beautiful, and, while it starts off as a sort of 
"fish-out-of-water" story, it quickly turns it something far more 
meaningful and mature than expected. Although basically a comedy, 
"Pleasantville" also contains many serious moments, including one scene 
in which David helps his mother, played splendidly by Allen, who has 
turned to real colors, and frightened at the prejudices of the other 
people in the town, to cover up her face with gray makeup.
One of the big treats of "Pleasantville" is the way that the film very 
gradually begins to transform things into technicolor. At first, it may 
just be small things in the background, such as a clock or a flower, and 
it is quite entertaining picking out all of the delicate changes. As far 
as I can tell, "Pleasantville" is the first film to actually blend 
black-and-white and color together in the same frame, and it is never 
less than convincing and always gorgeous and strangely poetic to look 
at. Credit certainly must go to production designer Jeannine Oppewall 
and cinematographer John Lindley, for creating a whole new, unexpected 
world.
"Pleasantville" easily could have been the fantasy of this generation, 
just like "The Wizard of Oz," but there are a few minor problems that 
ultimately hold it back from being a downright great film. One problem 
is the Don Knotts character, who has no point in the story but to give 
the kids the remote so they would be put inside "Pleasantville." We 
never really get to know who he is, or what his goal was. Witherspoon, 
who has proven herself a fine actress, and doesn't disappoint here, is 
nonetheless underused, and seems to all but disappear from the middle 
section of the picture. And my last minor quibble is that one of the 
climactic scenes set in the courtroom owes more than a little to, "To 
Kill a Mockingbird," right down to the way the building looks.
These slight distractions take very little away from "Pleasantville," 
however, because as previously mentioned, the film is a magical 
experience. It contains enchanting, one-of-a-kind images, a memorable, 
Oscar-worthy music score by Randy Newman, and then, and this is the big 
surprise for a mainstream film, it actually adds profundity and realism 
to what, on the surface, might appear to be merely a 50's sitcom satire.

Author
Bill Chambers
PLEASANTVILLE **1/2 (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers (wchamber@netcom.ca)
(Visit my review archive, play some movie trivia, and more!
FILM FREAK CENTRAL
http://www.geocities.com/~billchambers/ )
starring Tobey Maguire, Reese Witherspoon, Joan Allen, Jeff Daniels
written and directed by Gary Ross
PLEASANTVILLE is a kind of inverted Truman Show: its two protagonists
are aware they are stuck in a TV show, but everybody around them isn't.
This is a film that in its own peculiar way lectures against
conformity-life without individuality as a (here, literally and
figuratively) black and white world.
Maguire (The Ice Storm) stars as David, the World's Biggest
"Pleasantville" (a fictitious "Father Knows Best"-like family values
sitcom from the fifties) fan. One lonely Friday night, at the start of a
"Pleasantville" marathon, he and his rebellious sister Jennifer
(Witherspoon) are zapped into the program by a mysterious TV repairman
(Don Knotts-whose cameo garnered loud applause at the recent Toronto
International Film Festival premiere). The siblings must live out the
lives of characters Bud and Mary Sue Parker, son and daughter of
housewife Betty (Allen) and office man George (Fargo's William H. Macy).
David knows every episode by heart, so he finds it easy to blend in;
careless Jennifer is intent on taking Pleasantville by storm: within
hours of her arrival she steals a basketball player's virginity and
lectures her naive mother about the birds and the bees. Her impulsive
actions trigger a most unusual effect on the gray landscape: flowers,
trees, even people begin to look more vibrant than usual. At first,
Maguire scrambles to undo Witherspoon's mistakes', but when the love
bug bites him unsuspectingly, he joins the Pleasantville revolution.
Ross's (co-screenwriter of Big) beautifully-photographed (by John
Lindley) and scored (by Randy Newman) directorial debut is a flawed but
fascinating motion picure that recalls the fantasies of Robert Zemeckis
(Back To The Future, Forrest Gump). The movie demonstrates how a
mini-society can be corrupted by, frankly, the introduction of
free-spirited sex. Those who discover passion in Pleasantville turn to
colour; the town's traditionalist mayor Big Bob (the late J.T. Walsh)
outlaws "coloured people", resulting in street riots and political
protests. But the movie wants to have its cake and eat it, too: David
gives an impassioned, convincing speech that champions self-exploration
and experimentation.
PLEASANTVILLE's most problematic character is Macy's: as a chauvanistic
father and husband utterly dependent on his wife's homecare (he doesn't
even know how to heat up leftovers), we actually feel sorry for him when
she ditches him for golly-gee soda shop owner Daniels. It's not George's
fault he is a prototypical man-of-the-house fifties TV character. Ross
simultaneously resents and sympathizes with him. (The ending feels a bit
rushed, glossing over exactly what will become of George and others like
him.)
PLEASANTVILLE touches on giant issues (racism, book burning) but is a
bit too PG-13 "pleasant" in its execution. I was never quite sure what
Ross was trying to say, but his film is a finely acted,
thought-provoking experience nonetheless.

Author
Susan Granger
 If you can envision a surreal combination of "Alice in
Wonderland," "Wizard of Oz," and "The Stepford Wives," you've arrived
in "Pleasantville," a fictional black-and-white town where everything
is just about perfect. Like "The Truman Show." And just imagine what
would happen if two contemporary teenagers suddenly arrived. Like
"Back to the Future." In this daring modern fairy tale, "once upon a
time" involves Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon - fraternal twins -
who, after their parents' divorce, are having a pretty miserable
time. Suddenly, courtesy of a mysterious TV repair man (Don Knotts),
they find themselves trapped in a 1958 sit-com where Mom (Joan Allen)
wears pearls, bouffant hair, high heels, and a pretty dress as she's
cooking a "nourishing" breakfast of blueberry pancakes, scrambled
eggs, bacon, and ham steak every morning, and Dad (William H. Macy)
arrives from work every night at the same time, hangs up his hat, and
shouts, "Honey, I'm home." The kids hang out at Mr. Johnson's (Jeff
Daniels) Soda Shoppe and the school basketball team always wins.
Tobey quickly realizes that their presence in this kinder, gentler
time could alter reality, so he tries to stick to the script but
Reese, wailing about "nerdville," just wants to have fun. Inevitably,
they introduce "dangerous" elements like sensuality, diversity, and
possibility into the staid '50s sensibility. Writer Gary Ross ("Big,"
"Dave") creates a wildly imaginative concept and, in his directing
debut, transforms his black-and-white world into multi-colored magic
as the chaotic, discordant '60s arrives, complete with its requisite
rock music. On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "Pleasantville" is
an astonishing, intriguing, irresistible 10. This is a "must see" -
one of the best of the year!

Author
DeWyNGaLe
PLEASANTVILLE by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: A+
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Many films have stuck people into virtual worlds or worlds that aren't their
own, but Pleasantville stands out from every one of those films.  Many complain
that Pleasantville is too much like The Truman Show, which stars Jim Carrey as
a man that does not know his life is being filmed.  I do not see the
resemblance between the two films at all.  Pleasantville is much different in
almost every way.  
David (Tobey Maguire) and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon) are brother and sister. 
The two are teenagers that attend high school, who live in a town that is just
like any other town.  David is the kind of kid who likes to stay at home and
watch classic television show re-runs, and Jennifer is the type of kid who
likes to have fun and go on dates.  One night, the two are fighting over the
remote control and they end up destroying it.  Suspiciously, a T.V. repair main
(Don Knotts) comes to the door immediately after, without even being called. 
He gives them a new remote.  The two begin to fight again, when suddenly, they
are warped into the show of "Pleasantville."  Pleasantville is a 60s sitcom. 
Everything is perfect in the world.  It centers around one family, the Parkers.
 They are now Bud and Mary Sue Parker, the two children in the show
Pleasantville.  Their new parents are Betty (Joan Allen) and George. (William
H. Macy)
They conclude they must follow what the two characters did on the shows, so
they do not mess up the world of Pleasantville.  Mary Sue does not abide by
this rule at all.  She tries to live the lifestyle she lived before she was
sucked into this show as best as she can.  She teaches other people what the
real world is like as well.  She is messing up their entire universe.  As the
people start to learn there is an outside of Pleasantville, and they do not
have to be perfect, they start becoming color, along with the surroundings
around them.  There is a huge problem though.  The city council does not like
that the people are becoming color.  The leader (J.T. Walsh) has decided to
call a meeting.  He states he wants the city to stay "pleasant."  
As a result of people becoming color, racial tension is growing.  This is much
like the case between blacks and whites, which is not as strong now, but was
earlier on.  Signs read "No coloreds" and even the owner of the soda shop, Mr.
Johnson (Jeff Daniels), is having his shop torn down by the townspeople because
he is a promoter of color.
The performances in Pleasantville are unbelievably strong.  There are the
outsiders- Reese Witherspoon and Tobey Maguire, who are both very good. 
Witherspoon in particular does a fine job of acting while she has to go through
this terrible nightmare they call "Pleasantville."  Tobey Maguire is enjoyable
as the know it all about Pleasantville.  Then there are the people inside of
Pleasantville- Joan Allen, who is marvelous as she goes through the pain of
becoming color and making hard decisions, William H. Macy, who is very funny
and is much like a person of that era would be, Jeff Daniels, who gives an
emotional performance as he deals with the premise of color, Paul Walker, who
plays Skip Martin, a boy who learns a lot from Reese Witherspoon, and there is
J.T. Walsh who gives a great performance as the man who wants to put an end to
all this color business. 
The art direction in Pleasantville is simply amazing.  The way the color and
black and white people are in the same scenes together, walk by each other, and
change from black and white to color are all very difficult things to do, and I
found this very impressive.  Two scenes especially standed out visually to me. 
1. The scene in which Tobey Maguire applies black and white make up to Joan
Allen to cover up her color.  2. The scene in which Jeff Daniels removes the
make up, revealing color, with a napkin in the soda shop.
The moral story in Pleasantville is a wonderful one.  Many people look at this
film for the special effects, but they do no realize there is a deep meaning to
this film.  If you look deep inside yourself, you will find who you really are
and that you are a very colorful person.  You aren't the same as everyone else.
 The people of Pleasantville realized this and then they became color. 
This film should have been a huge Academy Award winner.  Unfortunately, it was
only nominated for a few, and did not win any of the awards.  If I were in
charge of the Academy, Pleasantville would have been nominated for Best
Picture, Best Supporting Actor- William H. Macy, Best Supporting Actor- Jeff
Daniels, Best Supporting Actress- Joan Allen, Best Supporting Actress- Reese
Witherspoon, Best Director- , Best Dramatic Score (it was nominated), Visual
Effects, Art Direction (it was nominated), Costume Design (it was nominated),
and Best Original Screenplay.  I think the reason it wasn't nominated for many
of these awards is because many people took this movie as a rip off of The
Truman Show. 
The Bottom Line- An inspirational story with flawless performances is quite
pleasant, don't you think?   

Author
Allan Woodward
 A true sleeper doesn't come along very often.  Films that aren't much more
than a tiny blip on the radar screen of our collective
Hollywood-consciousness, suddenly appearing at your local multiplex,
inspiring a lot of "what movie is that?" from people standing in front of
the box office, trying to choose a picture.  Pleasantville, the new film
from Gary Ross (co-creator of Dave and Big), is the genuine article: a
sleeper hit.
 Starring Tobey Maguire, recently seen in Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas,
and Reese Witherspoon (Fear, Twilight) as high-school twins, Pleasantville
tells the story of how these two are transported into the '50s-perfect world
of the titular television program.
Pleasantville the show enjoys immortal life on the TV Time! cable channel
and David (Maguire) is its biggest fan.  David's sister, Jennifer
(Witherspoon) is decidedly not a fan, more concerned with in-school
popularity and personal trampiness.  Through a bizarre twist involving a
mysterious TV repairman (Don Knotts), David and Jennifer get their big
chance to really get into their TV.  They take the places of Pleasantville's
regulars and assume the roles of Bud and Mary-Sue Parker, the perfect kids
of the perfect Pleasantville couple, George and Betty (expertly played with
a variety of layers by William H. Macy and Joan Allen).
Like The Wizard of Oz, which gets a splashy re-release on Friday, November
6th, Pleasantville uses color and monochrome to great effect.  David and
Jennifer's world is as colorful as our own, but Pleasantville is in
"glorious black-and-white," heightening the unreality of this depiction of a
'50s that never was.  In Pleasantville, everyone is pleasant, the Fire
Department only rescues cats out of trees (there are no fires) and the
regularity of existence is accepted by everyone.
The inclusion of these two is like introducing a virus into a petri dish.
Just by being there, they begin a sequence of changing events that have the
potential to shatter the apparently idyllic existence of Pleasantville.
This is a town where everyone has a role to play, no matter how monotonous.
Given a taste of irregularity, what would these people do?
The transformation is played out in the slow revelation of color.  First a
rose, then a taillight, splashes of iridescent red in the midst of a
grayscale environment.  Surroundings that bear witness to a shift in the
immortal regularity of Pleasantville are given tones and shades that never
existed before.  They are freed from within themselves and display this
outwardly.
As David and Jennifer, acting as not-quite-right Bud and Mary-Sue, continue
life within Pleasantville, carrying with them the concepts of free thought
(and free love), the change spreads to the inhabitants.  Soon the screen is
dotted with rich colors.  Books, once blank on the inside, now have words,
manifesting themselves as the classic elements of social change, delivering
ideas and philosophies to the ever-growing ranks of colorized Pleasantville
denizens.
Pleasantville is powerful allegory, presented in a format that Everyman can
enjoy. Seeded with humor and self-reference, the film molds potent thought
into entertainment.  Art, education, youth and sex are all rightly shown to
be universal vehicles of change.  The profound influence of artistic masters
such as Titian and van Gogh is introduced in a skillful scene involving a
newly-filled art book taken from the suddenly-relevant library.  Without
words, the deeply-moving experience of art as transcendence is given, like a
beautiful gift, to the audience.
Script, direction and eye-popping visual effects (this is the most gorgeous
movie this year, bar none) tie into first-rate performances from every cast
member, no matter how small the role.  J.T. Walsh makes his final film
appearance as Pleasantville's mayor, and is perfectly cast.  He is the
physical embodiment - soft middle and buzz cut - of the iconic, successful
'50s man.  Jeff Daniels, as Mr. Johnson, the Soda Shop owner, submits a
performance so skillfully-crafted and nuanced that it's like a living
Faberge egg that opens to reveal detail upon detail.
In fact, I could go on at length about the incredible acting work done in
Pleasantville.  When I say that the film has the best ensemble of the year,
I'm not exaggerating; it's impossible to find one performance that lacks.
Randy Newman's score is richly-textured, peppered with well-chosen '50s
standards, capped off by an excellent cover of The Beatles' Across the
Universe by Fiona Apple.
See Pleasantville.  This is the kind of film, packed with genuine resonance,
that puts saccharine, artificial pictures like Forrest Gump in their place,
inspiring and affirming even as it educates.
Just Rent It This Week: The English Patient; Starring Ralph Fiennes and
Kristin Scott Thomas.  Grade: A

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Pleasantville (1998)
Tobey Maguire, Jeff Daniels, Joan Allen, William H. Macy, J.T. Walsh, 
Reese Witherspoon, Don Knotts, Paul Walker, Marley Shelton, Jane 
Kaczmarek. Music by Randy Newman. Produced by Jon Kilik, Robert J. Degus, 
Steven Soderbergh, Gary Ross. Written and Directed by Gary Ross. 124 
minutes
PG-13, 5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
Ambitious, ingenious and visually breathtaking, "Pleasantville" is a 
rarity in contemporary filmmaking; a fully-realized vision that succeeds 
on multiple levels. Writer and director Gary Ross has crafted a wondrous 
experience that satisfies as a comedy, a fantasy, a drama and a parable. 
Movies don't get much better than this.
Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon play disaffected '90s teenagers 
magically whisked into "Pleasantville," a black and white '50s TV sitcom 
reminiscent of "Father Knows Best." Like Connecticut Yankees in Robert 
Young's Court, their presence has drastic effects on this safe, sanitized 
community, where books are blank, toilets don't exist and even married 
couples sleep in separate beds. 
As the citizens of Pleasantville discover art, sex and the concept of 
nonconformity, bursts of color appear in their monochromatic world. In 
short order, color begins to spread like a virus through the town, and 
while many are enthralled by the changes, others are angered by what they 
perceive as a threat to their way of life. Soon, the patriarchal power 
structure organizes, determined to rid Pleasantville of the curse of 
color.
First-time director Gary Ross, who wrote "Big" and "Dave," handles this 
challenging material with a sure, steady hand. Easing into the story with 
reassuring comedy, he maintains a gentle tone even as the film graduates 
into drama, addressing serious issues without ever becoming ponderous. 
Legendary director Frank Capra would surely be delighted to see the proud 
tradition of "It's a Wonderful Life" and "Mr. Smith Goes to Washington" 
carried on in a film of this caliber. 
"Pleasantville" is a deeply humane, spiritual film with an uplifting 
message that couldn't have come at a better time. These are dark days for 
our society. Recently, we've seen a man dragged behind a truck because of 
the color of his skin and a college student savagely beaten and left on a 
fence to die because of his sexual orientation. Conservative groups 
brandish the Bible like a weapon, using the mask of "family values" in a 
vain attempt to disguise their message of hate.
The more fearful citizens of Pleasantville exhibit the same behavior. As 
an increasing percentage of the populace changes from black and white to 
color, the result of embracing freedom and diversity to realize their 
potential, conservatives put signs in their windows reading "No Coloreds 
Allowed." When housewife Joan Allen embraces her sexuality and sees her 
pallid skin change to rich color, she panics. Fearing the wrath of her 
family and community, she tries to go "back in the closet" by covering 
her skin with monochrome makeup. Thankfully, she learns that once you've 
realized your God-given nature, it's wrong to live a lie. 
The symbolism and messages in "Pleasantville" aren't subtle: Ross chose 
not to work that way. "This movie is about the fact that personal 
repression gives rise to larger political oppression," he said in an 
interview. "That when we're afraid of certain things in ourselves or 
we're afraid of change, we project those fears on to other things, and a 
lot of very ugly social situations can develop."
If this all sounds awfully heavy, rest assured that the film is far from 
a two hour exercise in tubthumbing. Ross imbues the film with a lilting, 
lyrical feel, many humorous and touching moments, and absolutely 
remarkable visuals. From the image of a single red rose set against a 
black and white background to the visage of a gray-scale youth gazing at 
a gloriously colored city park, "Pleasantville" is flat-out dazzling to 
behold.   
The cast is wonderful as well. Tobey Maguire anchors the film as a 
detached, ironic contemporary youth who initially tries to preserve the 
integrity of Pleasantville, only to learn that nostalgia is not all it's 
cracked up to be. Reese Witherspoon is strong as his sister, a young 
woman whose attempts to build a life out of fashion, sexual encounters 
and glib nihilism leave her yearning for self-esteem and genuine 
emotional contact. 
Playing the citizens of Pleasantville, J.T. Walsh (in his final 
performance) and William H. Macy are strong as men traumatized by the 
changes to their well-ordered lives, and Jeff Daniels stands out as a 
gentle soul with the spirit of an artist buried beneath his passive 
demeanor. Out of all the actors, Joan Allen is perhaps the most memorable 
in a deliciously nuanced turn as the archetypal homemaker who blossoms 
into passionate individuality. 
Beyond its stunning visuals and important messages, "Pleasantville" 
shines as a work of sheer joy, without a hint of the cynicism that 
plagues modern films and our world in general. Gary Ross clearly believes 
that humanity can grow past its fears to become a truly multi-colored 
society where diversity is embraced and individuality can flourish. As I 
watch the grim forces determined to impose their fascistic, black and 
white "family values" agenda onto our culture, I pray that he is right.

Author
David Wilcock
Starring Tobey Maguire, Reese Witherspoon, Jeff Daniels and Joan Allen.
Directed By Gary Ross
Running Time: 2 hours.
Gary Ross delivers a pleasing directing debut in the form of this
entertaining movie. 'Pleasantville' is a T.V program set in the 50's where
everything is perfect and in black and white. David (Maguire) is the show's
biggest fan, who can name events that happen in every episode. Through a
series of events, David and hip sister Jennifer (Witherspoon) somehow end up
in the T.V program itself, as Bud and Mary Sue, characters from the show.
Their actions in the world start to change the Pleasantville world, and as
people start to discover their true 'colours', they leave their black and
white world and become technicolour themselves.
Gary Ross is no stranger to gentle sentimental comedies, having previously
written Big and Dave, both entertaining films. And Pleasantville is no
exception. Although it stumbles across the 'sentiment' line occasionally,
every scene is a delight. With a concept this high, the film may have gone
in over itself, but it keeps a firm head and remains all the more
pleasurably for it. In fact, I was sitting through the whole movie with a
big grin, due to the immense charm the film possessed. The cast contribute a
great deal to the film. Although Maguire is occasionally grating, he's
suited to the main role. He occasionally puts the moral of the story across
a little too strongly, especially at the end of the movie, but he's a
competent leading man. Witherspoon is good fun as the sister, although the
writers seem to forget about her near the end. She's certainly Gen-X enough,
and performs her role well. Her absolute horror when she discovers she's
'pasty' is great. Jeff Daniels delivers a somewhat awkward performance as
friendly burger bar owner Mr Johnson, who appears to be in a daze throughout
the whole movie. He tries a little too hard to be sentimental, and it
doesn't quite work. But it takes Joan Allen and William H. Macy to steal the
movie as Bud and Mary Lou's parents. Joan Allen gives a powerful performance
(as always) as the mum, and her pyrotechnic masturbation scene is
interesting to say the least. Although she's sadly given little to do other
than look sad for half of the film, but she does it so well it's irrelevant.
Macy gives another great performance, and the audience does feel genuinely
sorry for him when he returns home as usual and discovers that his dinner
isn't on the table. His three words, 'Where's my dinner?' will make the
strongest heart turn to something soft and squidgy. J.T Walsh also makes an
memorable appearance as the Mayor of Pleasantville, who's shocked at what's
going on with his town.
The special effects are also incredible. The colour mixes in seamlessly with
the black and white, and the effect is rather impressive. There's a lovely
scene with coloured blossom falling around the black and white David and his
girlfriend, and also the way the burger bar turns to colour is well handled.
The music is also great, consisting of lovely whimsical tune.s
But there's one problem with Pleasantville, and that's the fact that the
film doesn't have a clear direction.  Halfway through the movie, with all
the whimsy of the characters turning into colour, it suddenly veers
direction and turns into an 'anti racism' movie. Some of the scenes are
reminiscent of Nazi Germany, including a scene where the citizens burn all
the coloured books in Pleasantville. Then it veers again, turning into a
'don't be afraid to be yourself' moral, which is put across blatantly and
rather embarrassingly to the audience in an uncomfortable scene with David
and his mum. And the films conclusion is rather obvious, and although done
well, William H. Macy seems to get more of a bum rap than he deserves.
In the end, however, Pleasantville is a treat, a enjoyable film from
beginning to end. But with a little bit of work, Gary Ross's next work could
be _true_ brilliance.

Author
Mark O'Hara
There is no town called "Pleasantville" in my state.  But as my son and 
I left the theater, we saw a scene that could have been Main Street in 
the film Pleasantville.  The uptown area of a midwestern town: banks and 
small businesses, a gas station and United Dairy Farmers on the corner.  
Red bricks pave the street.
Gary Ross's version of Pleasantville has to be taken as a fable.  There 
are too many unexplained motives and twists.  Why would a TV repairman 
(Don Knotts) show up at a house just seconds after the remote is broken?  
Why would he send the children of the house into the black-and-white 
world of a 1958 sitcom?  How do the two survive there without access to 
bathrooms?
Once you have suspended your disbelief, however, Pleasantville is a 
pleasant diversion, one that is filled with delightful effects that 
generate fascinating ideas.
Tobey Maguire plays David, the slightly younger brother of Jennifer 
(Reese Witherspooon).  Quickly we see even David's sister perceives him 
as a dork;  one of her friends comments, "You must have come from, like, 
the cool side of the uterus."  It is when David and Jennifer have a tug 
o' war over a new and mysterious remote that they are thrust back into 
the pasty world of sexless situation comedy, the domain of Ozzie Nelson 
and Donna Reed and Robert Young (though here the teens get more of a 
taste of Rod Serling).  When the repairman refuses to speak with them, 
Bud and Mary Sue - the names of the TV characters they have replaced - 
are forced to inhabit the odd world whose "plots" David has memorized.
I was concerned that Pleasantville would jump on the bandwagon of 
cop-outs that dismisses large parts of the past as inferior and 
incorrect.  But the film is out neither to put down the past nor to 
pique our nostalgia.  What works best is the film's ideas.  First, it's 
one of the best arguments against censorship that has been added to our 
literature in some time.  A book burning scene is not as eerie, perhaps, 
as one in Fahrenheit 451, though its implications are just as chilling.  
More importantly, the film acts as the quintessential advertisement for 
the arts, going so far as to suggest they are indispensable to our 
humanity.  As a teacher, I only hope that younger viewers notice that 
good things happen to the residents when they read or paint.  The 
metaphorical black-and-white pallor vanishes in the person who goes 
after the "color" in life.
In Big and Dave, Gary Ross pursued unlikely storylines.  Here he expands 
upon his themes of magical accidents happening to everyday people.  And 
the tricks Ross employs are wonderful, the tale making use of technology 
not for explosions but for bizarre split-screens of color and meaning.  
A red rose is the first hue seen by Skip (Paul Walker), captain of the 
high school basketball team who has just been deflowered by Mary Sue 
Parker.  Her brother Bud connects the outbreaks of color to her 
transplanted 90's sensibilities.  Herein lies one of the film's 
weaknesses, when Bud constantly nags Mary Sue not to impose her 
behaviors on the innocent past.  It's as if we are watching a Bradbury 
story and the time travelers are threatened with the prospect of 
throwing off the entire future through a misplaced and miniscule action.  
It's Bud, too, who later tells his television dad, George Parker 
(William H. Macy), that change is inevitable and good, that it's harder 
to go back to the way you were before.
Ross is very clever when he re-enacts the fall of Adam and Eve, with a 
girl plucking a red apple from a black-and-white tree and tempting Bud.  
This is not heavy-handed symbolism; it's tongue-in-cheek mind-play, 
suggesting that life is happier when it is not sterile and perfect:  
it's best when there is silliness and sexiness and even danger.  
Timeless and entertaining ideas, these, the stuff of good literature.  
In one of the most charming subplots, Betty Parker finds her color by 
debunking the myths of dutiful wife and mother.  Looking like Pat Nixon 
again, Joan Allen is perfect in the role.  We chuckle when we see she 
must learn about sex from her daughter, who is now a regular at lover's 
lane.  And when Mr. Johnson (Jeff Daniels) rubs off the make-up she is 
using to cover her flesh tones, Betty realizes the potential of her own 
long-denied emotions.  Daniels also excels as Mr. Johnson, owner of the 
soda shop where Bud works.  Good at looking baffled at Bud's 
explanations, Daniels conveys the slow but complete change his character 
accomplishes.  Viewers will be fond of remembering a scene in which Bud 
brings Mr. Johnson a large art book from the library.  Johnson likes to 
paint Christmas scenes on the inside of his shop window, and here his 
epiphany is clear when he glimpses for the first time the Titians and 
Van Goghs, the sweet strains of Randy Newman's Pleasantville Suite 
rising in the background. 
Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon portray the most interesting 
relationship in the film.  As brother and sister, they bicker and ignore 
and defy, but just like the characters in the world they occupy, they 
end happily.  Witherspoon brings to her role a calculated agenda that 
only seems whimsical.  She puts on just the right wiles.  On the other 
hand, Maguire seems almost entirely innocent.  At times puzzled or 
frustrated, Maguire is best at the earnest straight-talking that serves 
as the film's most heavy-handed message, in a speech delivered to his 
real mother.  It's here that the script stumbles -- not Maguire's 
acting.  Both actors are beyond the teenage years they depict, but so 
probably are the rest of the supporting soda shop gang.
In his last role, J. T. Walsh is superb as "Big Bob," the mayor and 
head-honcho of the chamber of commerce and bowling league.  Walsh adds 
good comic timing to the dry edge given to his character, reminiscent of 
Dub Taylor or Martin Balsam, character actors capable of getting laughs 
out of dead-serious dialogue.  His short hair combed straight up in what 
the venerable barber in our town calls a "Princeton," Walsh wheedles and 
pontificates nicely.  The script fails him too, though, when his 
character charges off screen at the end of an otherwise powerful 
"trial."
I know why the producers chose the Beatles' song for the soundtrack, but 
why did they get Fiona Apple to sing it in a sleepy and sluggish voice?  
The other parts of the soundtrack are charming, Newman's generic but 
still moving compositions mixed with vintage pieces, snippets of which 
we hear at crucial spots in the story.
Leaving the theater, the film's ideas strong and immediate in my head, I 
remembered a Saturday afternoon eight years ago.  I had taken my son to 
see the first Ninja Turtles, and when we stepped out onto High Street, 
we saw a crowded and boisterous uptown.  I had forgotten about the Klan 
rally.  These happened in other towns, not ours.  As we stood before the 
old marquee of the Princess Theater, I thought quickly how I could get 
my 5 year-old to the car with safety and a minimal explanation.
It occurred to me that perhaps the most worthy part of Pleasantville is 
its attempt to engage profound ideas.  Sure, a lot is left unexplained, 
but we are also asked to think about the nature of hate and prejudice, 
the unpleasant colors in the human spectrum.


Author
Adam Godfrey
   Recently I read 4 reviews of Pleasantville-one from Entertainment Weekly,
one from a newsgroup, and two from different online resources. Each review
compared this film to The Truman Show.
   Why? The only reason people compared Pleasantville to Truman is due to the
fact that their lives are on television. Other than that, the two movies are
completely different from each other. Reviewers seem to love to pick one movie
(i.e. The Truman Show), obsess over it, and make it a guideline for other
movies. When Pleasantville and EDtv opened, all critics seemed to treat the two
films like they were subjects of King Truman. The same goes for The Thin Red
Line, as well. When it opened in Decemeber, probably 98% of reviews compared it
to Stephen Spielberg's Saving Private Ryan, giving Thin Line no chance
whatsoever. Critics loved Private Ryan so much, that they automatically decided
no movie is good enough to reach its standards.
   This is why I think Pleasantville was underrated. If The Truman Show had
never been made, Pleasantville probably would have received better reviews,
done better at the box office, and would be remembered after it's long been on
the video store shelves. Sure, it wasn't perfect, and it wasn't very
believeable, but neither was The Wizard of Oz or Star Wars, and there stands
two of the most prominent movies in history. 
   With the exception of Don Knotts as the annoying "TV repairman" the film is
cast perfectly: The Ice Storm's Tobey Maguire is David in real life; he watches
the old 50's sitcom "Pleasantville" to escape from his feuding parents. His
twin sister, Jen (Reese Witherspoon) is a popular slut who (steriotypically)
smokes and wears revealing clothes. But what makes her character believeable is
the dialogue-those excessive 90's terms such as "like", "whatever", and "cool"
make her sound like the total dimwit she's supposed to be. The twins, with a
little help from a TV repairman (casting Don Knotts in this role was obviously
a cameo-esque cast rather than a true acting one), are sucked into
Pleasantville by a magical new remote. Their new parents, played by William H.
Macy and Joan Allen, are perfect in every way. Their new names are Bud and Mary
Sue, and right away they start to corrupt the town of Pleasantville.
   After the siblings fit comfortably in their new roles, the movie begins to
take form. It's just like watching a sitcom in itself; you don't want it to
end. "Mary Sue" has sex with her date, the school basketball champion; when he
tells all his friends about it, they stop preforming perfectly at basketball,
and things start to take color. 
   Soon we learn that these people don't know how to express true emotions, and
when they learn to do so, they eventually turn into color. This eventually
sparks a racial war between the "coloreds" and the "black & whites."
   Entertainment Weekly reviewer Lisa Schwarzbaum claims the movie has, "none
of the depth, poignance, and brilliance of The Truman Show..." Yes, The Truman
Show was maybe a little more intelligent. But the racial setting-intensified by
the forcing of the coloreds to sit in the upper box of the courtroom-certainly
classifies as deep, considering it's what I least expected. 
   Gary Ross did not try to create an intelligent, award masterpiece-he just
tries to convey moral messages within his work. Take for example Big and Dave,
his past films. Big-be careful what you wish for. Dave-Good or bad lying is
still lying. Did these movies win big awards? No, but they won the heart of
millions.
   Pleasantville could have done that too, if it wasn't for snotty reviewers
who set precedents with preceeding films. Pleasantville: A-
Ad2am 
"I almost lost my nose...and I like it. I like breathing through it."
-Jack Nicholson, Chinatown

Author
Danielle Flynn
'Pleasantville' (1998) Taps into Hollywood's Lack of Integrity with Subtle
Messages That Can Be Easily Missed
In Short:
It takes a lot of careful observation to see the true morals and lessons
brought out in this film; one can easily be misled as to what the real message
is.
Review:
In a literally colorless world with an almost mechanical population, there is
no room for transitioning variety or even the customary happenings of everyday
life, such as rain, fire, or emotions. The town of Pleasantville has one
adjective: pleasant. There is no sadness, no fear, no danger, no discomfort, no
love, and no hate. Put simply, it's a place Alanis Morissette could really work
wonders for. J One big note however is that it is only a 50's sitcom that airs
in reruns on an "oldies" TV station or is it?
I had waited months to see this movie and after doing so on opening day I was
not disappointed. I found it quite intriguing and delightful and went back 3
more times in the period it endured at the box office. But it wasn't until
months later, when I slipped in for a small showing in one of those crummy
"dollar theaters" after not having seen it for so long, that my eyes were
opened to such a deeper meaning and perspective than I had previously
experienced.
It is a far too feasible misconception that this is a film which forwards the
idea that a world without some "healthy" immorality is not a world at all.
Instead, the actual message, which so far has not been recognized by many
viewers that I know of, is that a world without immorality doesn't give one the
ability to discern right and wrong for himself, because everything is
automatically right. There is no room for mistakes and growth and learning
because there are no mistakes to be made, no space for growth, and never
anything new to learn, and that is the key component to the entire purpose of
the story. Now I'm not saying that's necessarily the way it was intended to be
interpreted, but that is hands down the proper way in which it should be.
Besides a hidden symbolic depth and themes that go beyond what we can absorb
from previews, this film has elements of physical wonder and strength that make
it just so great to watch. The visual effects are indeed striking and what
little color is revealed is impartially favorable. After spending the bulk of
the movie staring at black and white, it's hard not to identify and appreciate
the fact that our own world allows for all that brilliance and more. A truly
intelligent addition to it all, however, is the charming and ardently
attainable cast that operates together like clockwork.
That said, the plot goes as such. David and Jennifer are two very 90's high
school twins with the typical "relationship" outline of
don't-mess-with-my-life-and-I-won't-mess-with-yours. They demonstrate the
well-known teenage qualities of two of the common versions of adolescents
today. David is the shyer, subtler twin who would rather watch TV Land than
MTV, while Jennifer is the wild, licentious one who spends her days at the mall
and relishes in the pleasures of the offensive world of degradation.
But when a freak accident enchantingly plops them smack dab in the middle of
Pleasantville as two of the main characters, they are forced to depend on each
other to make it back home. Nevertheless, Jennifer works her magic and
introduces the town to a more unrestrained approach to life, and while David
frantically tries to stop her and get them back home, he realizes that change
was exactly what the town needed. And, as said earlier, not to flip the town
around into some corrupt society, but rather to give people the choice to
decide between good and bad and to reap the results of their decisions and
learn from them. Not only were difficult choices being brought upon the town,
but the simple accepted occurrences of ordinary existence also began to take
place. People got hurt. They cried. They became afraid and happy and thoughtful
and started to think for themselves, and that's when their physical world
turned colors as well.
This can be looked upon as quite a controversial movie, but to me the message
is finally clear. I hope after reading this people can be more open to the film
than they had been in the past, and realize that without choosing how our own
lives will be run, we'll never know what we could have done better.
Until the next great movie I see, I remain sincerely,
Danielle Flynn, IMR
